Cab
Cab. n.s. [קב.] A Hebrew measure, containing about three pints English, or the eighteenth part of the ephah.

Cabal (noun)
Caba'l. n.s. [cabale, Fr. קבלה, tradition.]

 The secret science of the Hebrew rabbins.

 A body of men united in some close design. A cabal differs from a party, as few from many.
She often interposed her royal authority, to break the cabals which were forming against her first ministers. Addison.
 Intrigue.
When each, by curs'd cabals of women, strove,To draw th' indulgent king to partial love. Dryden's Aureng.

Cabal (verb)
To Caba'l. v.n. [cabaler, Fr.] To form close intrigues; to intrigue; to unite in small parties.
His mournful friends, summon'd to take their leaves,Are throng'd about his couch, and sit in council:What those caballing captains may design,I must prevent, by being first in action. Dryden's D. Sebast.

Cabalist
Ca'balist. n.s. [from cabal.] One skilled in the traditions of the Hebrews.
Then Jove thus spake: With care and painWe form'd this name, renown'd in rhime,Not thine, immortal Neufgermain!Cost studious cabalists more time. Swift.

Caballer
Caba'ller. n.s. [from cabal.] He that engages in close designs; an intriguer.
Factious and rich, bold at the council board,But cautious in the field, he shun'd the sword;A close caballer, and tongue-valiant lord. Dryden.

Caballine
Caba'lline. adj. [caballinus, Lat.] Belonging to a horse; as, caballine aloes, or horse aloes.

Caballistical
Caballi'stical.Caballi'stick.

adj. [from cabal.] Something that has an occult meaning.


The letters are caballistical, and carry more in them than it is proper for the world to be acquainted with. Addison. Spect.
He taught them to repeat two caballistick words, in pronouncing of which the whole secret consisted. Spectator, № 578.

Caballistick
Caballi'stical.Caballi'stick.

adj. [from cabal.] Something that has an occult meaning.


The letters are caballistical, and carry more in them than it is proper for the world to be acquainted with. Addison. Spect.
He taught them to repeat two caballistick words, in pronouncing of which the whole secret consisted. Spectator, № 578.

Cabaret
Ca'baret. n.s. [French.] A tavern.
Suppose this servant passing by some cabaret, or tennis-court, where his comrades were drinking or playing, should stay with them, and drink or play away his money. Bramhall against Hobbes.

Cabbage (noun)
Ca'bbage. n.s. [cabus, Fr. brassica, Lat.] A plant.
The leaves are large, fleshy, and of a glaucous colour; the flowers consist of four leaves, which are succeeded by long taper pods, containing several round acrid seeds.  The species are, 1. The common white cabbage. 2. The red cabbage. 3. The Russian cabbage. 4. The flat-sided cabbage. 5. The sugar loaf cabbage. 6. The early Battersea cabbage. 7. The white Savoy cabbage. 8. The green Savoy cabbage. 9. The boorcole. 10. The green broccoli. 11. The Italian broccoli. 12. The turnep-rooted cabbage. 13. The cauliflower. 14. The turnep cabbage. 15. Curled colewort. 16. The musk cabbage. 17. Branching tree cabbage, from the sea coast. 18. Brown broccoli. 19. Common colewort. 20. Perennial Alpine colewort. 21. Perfoliated wild cabbage, with a white flower. 22. Perfoliated cabbage, with a purple flower. The common white, red, flat, and long-sided cabbages, are chiefly cultivated for winter use; the seeds of which must be sown in the middle of March, in beds of good fresh earth.  The Russian cabbage was formerly in much greater esteem than at present, and is rarely brought to the market. The early Battersea and sugar-loaf cabbages, are called Michaelmas cabbages; the season for sowing them is in the middle of July, in an open spot of ground.  The Savoy cabbages are propagated for winter use, as being generally esteemed the better, when pinched by frost.  The boorcole is never eaten till the frost has rendered it tender.  The turnep cabbage was formerly more cultivated in England than at present; and some esteem this kind for soups, but it is generally too strong, and seldom good, except in hard winters.  The curled colewort is more generally esteemed, and is fit for use after Christmas, and continues good until April.  The musk cabbage has, through negligence, been almost lost in England, though, for eating, it is one of the best kinds we have; for it is always looser, and the leaves more crisp and tender, and has a most agreeable musky scent when cut. It will be fit for use in October, November, and December. The branching sea cabbage is found wild in England, and on the sea coast, and is sometimes gathered by the poor inhabitants in the spring, and eaten; but it is apt to be strong and bitter.  The brown broccoli is by many esteemed, though it does not deserve a place in the kitchen garden, where the Roman broccoli can be obtained, which is much sweeter, and will continue longer in season.  The Roman broccoli has large heads, which appear in the center of the plants like clusters of buds.  The heads should be cut before they run up to seed, with about four or five inches of the stems; the skin of these stems should be stripped off, before they are boiled; they will eat very tender, and little inferiour to asparagus.  The common colewort is now almost lost near London, where their markets are usually supplied with cabbage or Savoy plants instead of them; which, being tenderer and more delicate, are better worth cultivating.  The perennial Alpine colewort is also little cultivated at present. The other two sorts of wild cabbage are varieties fit for a botanick garden, but are plants of no use.  The cauliflowers have, of late years, been so far improved in England, as to exceed, in goodness and magnitude, what are produced in most parts of Europe; and, by the skill of the gardners, are continued for several months together; but the most common season for them is in May, June, and July. Miller.
Cole, cabbage, and coleworts, which are soft and demulcent, without any acidity; the jelly, or juice, of red cabbage, baked in an oven, and mixed with honey, is an excellent pectoral. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Cabbage (verb)
To Ca'bbage. v.a. [a cant word among taylors.] To steal in cutting clothes.
Your taylor, instead of shreads, cabbages whole yards of cloth. Arbuthnot's History of J. Bull.

Cabbage Tree
Ca'bbage tree. n.s. A species of palm-tree; which see.
It is very common in the Caribee islands, where it grows to a prodigious height.  The leaves of this tree envelope each other, so that those which are inclosed, being deprived of the air, are blanched; which is the part the inhabitants cut for plaits for hats, &c. and the genuine, or young shoots, are pickled, and sent into England by the name of cabbage; but whenever this part is cut out, the trees are destroyed; nor do they rise again from the old roots; so that there are very few trees left remaining near plantations, except for ornament; for their stems being exceedingly straight, and their leaves being produced very regularly at top, will afford a most beautiful prospect; for which reason, the planters generally spare two or three of them near their habitations. Miller.

Cabbage-worm
Ca'bbage-worm. n.s. An insect.

Cabin (noun)
Ca'bin. n.s. [cabane, Fr. chabin, Welch, a cottage.]

 A small room.
So long in secret cabin there he heldHer captive to his sensual desire,Till that with timely fruit her belly swell'd,And bore a boy unto a savage fire. Fairy Queen, b. i. c. vi.
 A small chamber in a ship.
	Give thanks you have lived so long, and make yourself ready, in your cabin, for the mischance of the hour, if it so happen. Shakesp. Tempest.
Men may not expect the use of many cabins, and safety at once, in the sea service. Raleigh's Essays.
The chessboard, we say, is in the same place it was, if it remain in the same part of the cabin, though, perhaps, the ship it is in, sails all the while. Locke.
 A cottage, or small house.
Come from marble bow'rs, many times the gay harbour of anguish,Until a silly cabin, though weak, yet stronger against woes. Sidney, b. i.
Neither should that odious custom be allowed, of flaying off the green surface of the ground, to cover their cabins, or make up their ditches. Swift.
 A tent.
Some of green boughs their tender cabins frame,	Some lodged were Tortosa's streets about. Fairfax, b. i.

Cabin (verb active)
To Ca'bin. v.a. To confine in a cabin.
                     Fleance is 'scap'd:Then comes my fit again; I had else been perfect;	Whole as the marble, sounded as the rock;	As broad and gen'ral as the casing air;But now I'm cabin'd, cribb'd, confin'd, bound in,	To saucy doubts and fear. Shakesp. Macbeth.

Cabin (verb neuter)
To Ca'bin. v.n. [from the noun.] To live in a cabin.
I'll make you feed on berries and on roots,And feed on curds and whey, and suck the goat,And cabin in a cave. Shakesp. Titus Andronicus.

Cabined
Ca'bined. adj. [from cabin.] Belonging to a cabin.
The nice morn, on the Indian steep, From her cabin'd loophole peep. Milton.

Cabinet
Ca'binet. n.s. [cabinet, Fr.]

 A set of boxes or drawers for curiosities; a private box.
 At both corners of the farther side, by way of return, let there be two delicate or rich cabinets, daintily paved, richly hanged, glazed with crystaline glass, and a rich cupola in the midst, and all other elegancy that may be thought on. Bacon's Essays.
 Who sees a soul in such a body set, Might love the treasure for the cabinet. Ben Johnson.
 In vain the workman shew'd his wit,With rings and hinges counterfeit,	To make it seem, in this disguise, A cabinet to vulgar eyes. Swift.
 Any place in which things of value are hidden.
 Thy breast hath ever been the cabinet, Where I have lock'd my secrets. Denham's Sophy.
 We cannot discourse of the secret, but by describing our duty; but so much duty must needs open a cabinet of mysteries. Taylor's Worthy Communicant.
  A private room in which consultations are held.
 You began in the cabinet what you afterwards practised in the camp. Dryden.
  In Spenser it seems to signify a hut, or house.
Hearken awhile in thy green cabinet, The lawrel song of careful Colinet. Spenser's Pastorals.

Cabinet-council
Ca'binet-council. n.s. A council held in a private manner, with unusual privacy and confidence.
The doctrine of Italy, and practice of France, in some kings times, hath introduced cabinet-councils. Bacon's Essays.
From the highest to the lowest it is universally read; from the  cabinet-council to the nursery. Gay to Swift.

Cabinet-maker
Ca'binet-maker. n.s. [from cabinet and make.] One that makes small nice work in wood.
The root of an old white thorn will make very fine boxes and combs; so that they would be of great use for the cabinet-makers, as well as the turners, and others. Mortimer.

Cable
Ca'ble. n.s. [cabl, Welch; cabel, Dutch]  The great rope of a ship to which the anchor is fastened.
What though the mast be now blown overboard,The cable broke, the holding anchor lost,And half our sailors swallow'd in the flood,Yet lives our pilot still? Shakesp. Henry VI. p. iii.
True it is, that the length of the cable is the life of the ship in all extremeties, and the reason is, because it makes so many bendings and waves, as the ship, riding at that length, is not able to stretch it; and nothing breaks that is not stretched. Raleigh's Essays.
The cables crack, the sailors fearful criesAscend; and sable night involves the skies. Dryden's Virg.

Caburns
Ca'burns. n.s. Small ropes used in ships. Dict.

Cacao
Ca'cao. See Chocolatenut.

Cachectical
Cache'ctical.Cache'ctick.

adj.. [from chachexy.] Having an ill habit of body; showing an ill habit.


Young and florid blood, rather than vapid and cahectical. Arbuthnot on Air.
The crude chyle swims in the blood, and appears as milk in the blood, let out of some persons who are generally cachectick. Floyer on the Humours.

Cachectick
Cache'ctical.Cache'ctick.

adj.. [from chachexy.] Having an ill habit of body; showing an ill habit.


Young and florid blood, rather than vapid and cahectical. Arbuthnot on Air.
The crude chyle swims in the blood, and appears as milk in the blood, let out of some persons who are generally cachectick. Floyer on the Humours.

Cachexy
Cache'xy. n.s.. [καχεξία.] A general word to express a great variety of symptoms; most commonly it denotes such a distemperature of the humours, as hinders nutrition, and weakens the vital and animal functions, proceeding from weakness of the fibres, and an abuse of the non-naturals, and often from severe acute distempers. Arbuthnot on Diet..

Cachinnation
Cachinna'tion. n.s. [cachinnatio, Lat.] A loud laughter. D.

Cackerel
Ca'ckerel. n.s. A fish, said to make those who eat it laxative.

Cackle (noun)
Ca'ckle. n.s. [from the verb.]  The voice of a goose or fowl.
The silver goose before the shining gateThere flew, and, by her cackle, sav'd the state. Dryden

Cackle (verb)
To Ca'ckle. v.n. [kaeckelen, Dutch.]

 To make a noise as a goose.
The nightingale, if she should sing by day,When every goose is cackling, would be thoughtNo better a musician than the wren. Shakesp. M. of Venice.
Goose, if I had you upon Sarum plain,I'd drive thee cackling home to Camelot. Shakesp. K. Lear.
Or rob the Roman geese of all their glories,And save the state, by cackling to the tories. Pope
 Sometimes it is used for the noise of a hen.
Now to my story I return again:The trembling widow, and her daughters twain,This woeful cackling cry, with horror heard,Of those distracted damsels in the yard. Dryden's Fab.
 To laugh; to giggle.
Then Nic. grinned, cackled, and laughed, till he was like to kill himself, and seemed to be so pleased, that he fell a frisking and dancing about the room. Arbuthnot's J. Bull.

Cackler
Cac'kler. n.s. [from cackle.]

 A fowl that cackles.

 A teltale, a tatler.

Cacochymical
Cacochy'mical . Cacochy'mick .

 adj. [from cacochymy.] Having the humours corrupted.


It will prove very advantageous, if only cacochymick, to clarify his blood with a laxative. Harvey on Consumptions.
If the body be cacochymical, the tumours are apt to degenerate into very venomous and malignant abscesses. Wiseman.
The ancient writers distinguished putrid fevers, by putrefaction of blood, choler, melancholy, and phlegm; and this is to be explained by an effervescence happening in a particular cacochymical blood. Floyer on the Humours.

Cacochymick
Cacochy'mical . Cacochy'mick .

 adj. [from cacochymy.] Having the humours corrupted.


It will prove very advantageous, if only cacochymick, to clarify his blood with a laxative. Harvey on Consumptions.
If the body be cacochymical, the tumours are apt to degenerate into very venomous and malignant abscesses. Wiseman.
The ancient writers distinguished putrid fevers, by putrefaction of blood, choler, melancholy, and phlegm; and this is to be explained by an effervescence happening in a particular cacochymical blood. Floyer on the Humours.

Cacochymy
Cacochy'my. n.s. [κακόχομία.] A depravation of the humours from a sound state, to what the physicians call by a general name of a cacochymy. Spots, and discolourations of the skin, are signs of weak fibres; for the lateral vessels, which lie out of the road of circulation, let gross humours pass, which could not, if the vessels had their due degree of stricture.  Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Strong beer, a liquor that attributes the better half of its ill qualities to the hops, consisting of an acrimonious firy nature, sets the blood, upon the least cacochymy, into an orgasmus, by an ill ferment. Harvey on Consumptions.

Cake (noun)
Cake. n.s. [cuch, Teutonick.]

 A kind of delicate bread.
You must be seeing christnings? do you look for ale and cakes here, you rude rascals? Shakesp. Henry VIII.
My cake is dough, but I'll in among the rest,Out of hope of all, but my share of the feast. Shakesp. Taming of the Shrew.
The dismal day was come, the priests prepareTheir leaven'd cakes, and fillets for my hair. Dryden's Æn.
 Any thing of a form rather flat than high; by which it is sometimes distinguished from a loaf.
There is a cake that groweth upon the side of a dead tree, that hath gotten no name, but it is large and of a chesnut colour, and hard and pithy. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 552.
Then when the fleecy skies new cloath the wood,And cakes of rustling ice come rolling down the flood. Dryden's Virgil, Georg. i. l. 418.

Calendar (noun)
Ca'lendar. n.s. [calendarium, Lat.] A register of the year, in which the months, and stated times, are marked, as festivals and holidays.
What hath this day deserv'd? what hath it done,That it in golden letter should be setAmong the high tides, in the calendar? Shakesp. K. John.
We compute from calendars differing from one another; the compute of the one anticipating that of the other. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.
Curs'd be the day when first I did appear;Let it be blotted from the calendar,Lest it pollute the month. Dryden's Fab.

Calf
Calf. n.s. calves in the plural. [calꝼ, Saxon; kalf, Dutch.]

 The young of a cow.
The colt hath about four years of growth; and so the fawn, and so the calf. Bacon's Nat. Hist. № 759.
Acosta tells us of a fowl in Peru, called condores, which will, of themselves, kill and eat up a whole calf at a time. Wilkin's Mathematical Magick.
Ah! Blouzelind, I love thee more by half,Than does their fawns, or cows the new-fall'n calf. Gay.
 Calves of the lips, mentioned by Hosea, signify sacrifices of praise and prayers, which the captives of Babylon addressed to God, being no longer in a condition to offer sacrifices in his temple. Calmet.
Take with you words, and turn to the Lord, and say unto him, Take away all iniquity, and receive us graciously, so will we render the calves of our lips. Hosea, xiv. 2.
 The thick, plump, bulbous part of the leg. [kalf, Dutch.]
Into her legs I'd have love's issues fall,And all her calf into a gouty small. Suckling.
The calf of that leg blistered. Wiseman's Surgery.

Caloyers
Calo'yers. n.s. [καλος.] Monks of the Greek church.

Caltrops
Ca'ltrops. n.s. [colꞇꞃæpp, Saxon.]

 An instrument made with three spikes, so that which way soever it falls to the ground, one of them points upright, to wound horses feet.
 The ground about was thick sown with caltrops, which very much incommoded the shoeless Moors. Dr. Addison's Account of Tangiers.
 A plant.
 It is very common in the South of France, Spain, and Italy, where it grows among corn, and on most of the arable land, and is very troublesome to the feet of cattle; for the fruit being armed with strong prickles, run into the feet of the cattle, which walk over the land. This is certainly the plant which is mentioned in Virgil's Georgick, under the name of tribulus. Miller.

Calumny
Ca'lumny. n.s. [calumnia, Lat.] Slander; false charge; groundless accusation.
Be thou as chaste as ice, as pure as snow,Thou shalt not escape calumny. Shakesp. Hamlet.
It is a very hard calumny upon our soil or climate, to affirm, that so excellent a fruit will not grow here. Temple.

Camel
Ca'mel. n.s. [camelus, Lat.] An animal very common in Arabia, Judea, and the neighbouring countries.  One sort is large, and full of flesh, and fit to carry burdens of a thousand pounds weight, having one bunch upon its back.  Another has two bunches upon their backs, like a natural saddle, and are fit either for burdens, or men to ride on.  A third kind is leaner, and of a smaller size, called dromedaries, because of their swiftness; which are generally used for riding by men of quality.  See Dromedary.
Camels have large solid feet, but not hard; in the spring, their hair falls entirely off, in less than three days time, when the flies are extremely uneasy to them.  Camels, it is said, will continue ten or twelve days without eating or drinking, and keep water a long time in their stomach, for their refreshment.  It is reported, that nature has furnished them, for this purpose, with a very large ventricle, with many bags closed within the coats of it, round about it, for reserving the water.  But the Jesuits in China, where they dissected several camels, found no such bags.  When a camel is upon a journey, his master follows him, singing and whistling; and the louder he sings, the better the camel goes.  The flesh of camels is served up at the best tables, among the Arabians, Persians, and other eastern nations; but the use of it was forbid the Hebrews, they being ranked by Moses among the unclean creatures, Deut. xiv. 7. Calmet.
                Patient of thirst and toil,Son of the desert! even the camel feels,Shot through his wither'd heart, the firy blast. Thomson.

Camelopard
Came'lopard. n.s. [from camelus and pardus, Lat.] An Abyssinian animal, taller than an elephant, but not so thick.  He is so named, because he has a neck and head like a camel; he is spotted like a pard, but his spots are white upon a red ground.  The Italians call him giaraffa. Trevoux.

Campion
Ca'mpion. n.s. [lychnis, Lat.] A plant.
The leaves are whole, and grow opposite by pairs upon the stalks; the cup of the flower is whole, and either tubulous or swelling; the flower consists of five leaves, which expand in form of a clove gilliflower, and are generally heartshaped; the ovary, which rises in the centre of the calyx, becomes a conical fruit, which is wrapt up in the flower cup, and has commonly one cell, filled with seeds, which are roundish, angular, and kidney-shaped. Miller.

Cap (noun)
Cap. n.s. [cap, Welch; cæpp, Sax. cappe, Germ. cappe, Fr. cappa, Ital. capa, Span. kappe, Dan. and Dutch; caput, a head, Latin.]

 The garment that covers the head.
Here is the cap your worship did bespeak. —Why, this was moulded on a porringer,A velvet dish. Shakesp. Taming the Shrew.
I have ever held my cap off to thy fortune. —— Thou hast serv'd me with much faith. Shakesp.
First, lolling, sloth in woollen cap,Taking her after-dinner nap. Swift.
The cap, the whip, the masculine attire,For which they roughen to the sense. Thomson's Autumn.
 The ensign of the cardinalate.
Henry the fifth did sometimes prophesy,If once he came to be a cardinal,He'd make his cap coequal with the crown. Shakesp. H. VI.
 The topmost; the highest.
Thou art the cap of all the fools alive. Shakesp. Timon.
 A reverence made by uncovering the head.
They more and less, came in with cap and knee,Met him in boroughs, cities, villages. Shakesp. Henry IV.
Should the want of a cap or a cringe so mortally discompose him, as we find afterwards it did. L'Estrange.
 A vessel made like a cap.
It is observed, that a barrel or cap, whose cavity will contain eight cubical feet of air, will not serve a diver above a quarter of an hour. Wilkins.
 Cap of a great gun. A piece of lead laid over the touch-hole, to preserve the prime.

 Cap of maintenance. One of the regalia carried before the king at the coronation.

Car (noun)
Car. n.s. [car, Welch; karre, Dut. cꞃæꞇ, Sax. carrus, Lat.]

 A small carriage of burden, usually drawn by one horse or two.
 When a lady comes in a coach to our shops, it must be followed by a car loaded with Mr. Wood's money. Swift.
 In poetical language, a chariot; a chariot of war, or triumph.
 Henry is dead, and never shall revive: Upon a wooden coffin we attend, And death's dishonourable victory, We with our stately presence glorify, Like captives bound to a triumphant car. Shakesp. Hen. VI.
 Wilt thou aspire to guide the heav'nly car, And with thy daring folly burn the world. Shakesp.
 And the gilded car of day, His glowing axle doth allay In the steep Atlantick stream. Milton.
 See, where he comes, the darling of the war! See millions crouding round the gilded car! Prior.
 The Charles's wain, or Bear; a constellation.
 Ev'ry fixt and ev'ry wand'ring star, The Pleiads, Hyads, and the Northern Car. Dryden.

Car (place names)
Car, Char, in the names of places, seem to have relation to the British caer, a city. Gibson's Camden.

Carbonado (noun)
Carbona'do. n.s. [carbonade, Fr. from carbo, a coal, Lat.] Meat cut cross, to be broiled upon the coals.
If I come in his way willingly, let him make a carbonado of me. Shakesp. Henry IV.

Carbonado (verb)
Carbona'do. v.a. [from the noun.] To cut, or hack.
Draw, you rogue, or I'll so carbonadoYour shanks. Shakesp. King Lear.

Carmine
Ca'rmine. n.s. A bright red or crimson colour, bordering on purple, used by painters in miniature. It is the most valuable product of the cochineal mastick, and of an excessive price. Chambers.

Carnage
Ca'rnage. n.s. [carnage, Fr. from caro, carnis, Lat.]

 Slaughter; havock; massacre.
 He brought the king's forces upon them rather as to carnage than to fight, insomuch as without any great loss or danger to themselves, the greatest part of the seditious were slain. Hayw.
 Heaps of flesh.
                     Such a scent I draw Of carnage, prey innumerable! and tasteThe favour of death from all things there that live. Milton.
 His ample maw, with human carnage fill'd, A milky deluge next the giant swill'd. Pope's Odyssey.

Carnivorous
Carni'vorous. adj. [from carnis and voro.] Flesh-eating; that of which flesh is the proper food.
In birds there is no mastication or comminution of the meat in the mouth; but in such as are not carnivorous, it is immediately swallowed into the crop or crow. Ray on the Creation.
Man is by his frame, as well as his appetite, a carnivorous animal. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Cart (noun)
Cart. n.s. See Car. [cræt, crat, Sax.]

 A carriage in general.
 The Scythians are described by Herodotus to lodge always in carts, and to feed upon the milk of mares. Temple.
 Triptolemus, so sung the Nine, Strew'd plenty from his cart divine. Dryden.
 A wheel-carriage, used commonly for luggage.
 Now while my friend, just ready to depart, Was packing all his goods in one poor cart, He stopp'd a little —— Dryden's Juvenal.
 A small carriage with two wheels, used by husbandmen, distinguished from a waggon, which has four wheels.
 Alas! what weights are these that load my heart! I am as dull as winter-starved sheep, Tir'd as a jade in overloaden cart. Sidney.
 The vehicle in which criminals are carried to execution.
 The squire, whose good grace was to open the scene, Now fitted the halter, now travers'd the cart, And often took leave, but was loth to depart. Prior.

Cassation
Cassátion. n.s. [cassatio, Lat.] A making null or void. D.

Cast (verb active)
To Cast. v.a. preter. cast; particip. pass. cast. [kaster, Danish.]

 To throw with the hand.
I rather chuse to endure the wounds of those darts, which envy casteth at novelty, than to go on safely and sleepily in the easy ways of ancient mistakings. Raleigh's Hist. of the World.
They had compassed in his host, and cast darts at the people from morning till evening. 1 Macc. vii. 80.
                Then cast thy sword away,And yield thee to my mercy, or I strike. Dryden and Lee.
 To throw away, as useless or noxious.
            Old Capulet, and Montague,Have made Verona's ancient citizensCast by their grave beseeming ornaments. Shakesp.
                I have broughtGolden opinion from all sort of people,Which would be worn now in their newest gloss,Not cast aside so soon. Shakesp. Macbeth.
When men, presuming themselves to be the only masters of right reason, cast by the votes and opinions of the rest of mankind, as not worthy of reckoning. Locke.
 To throw dice, or lots.
And Joshua cast lots for them in Shiloh. Josh. xviii. 10.
 To throw from a high place.
Bear him to the rock Tarpeian, and from thenceInto destruction cast him. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 To throw in wrestling.
And I think, being too strong for him, though he took my legs sometime, yet I made a shift to cast him. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 To throw as a net or snare.
I speak for your own profit, not that I may cast a snare upon you. 1 Cor. vii. 35.
 To drop; to let fall.
They let down the boat into the sea, as though they would have cast anchor. Acts, xxvii. 30.
 To expose.
His friends contend to embalm his body, his enemies, that they may cast it to the dogs. Pope's Essay on Homer.
 To drive by violence of weather.
Howbeit we must be cast upon a certain island. Acts, xxvii. 26.
What length of lands, what ocean have you pass'd,What storms sustain'd, and on what shore been cast? Dryd.
 To build by throwing up earth; to raise.
And shooting in the earth, casts up a mount of clay. Spenser's Fairy Queen, b. i. c. viii. stanz. 9.
The king of Assyria shall not come into this city, nor shoot an arrow there, nor come before it with shield, nor cast a bank against it. 2 Kings, xix. 32.
At length Barbarossa having cast up his trenches, landed fifty-four pieces of artillery for battery. Knolles's History.
Earth-worms will come forth, and moles will cast up more, and fleas bite more, against rain. Bacon's Nat. History.
 To put into any certain state.
Jesus had heard that John was cast into prison. Matt. iv. 12.
At thy rebuke both the chariot and horse are cast into a dead sleep. Psalm lxxvi. 6.
 To condemn in a trial.
But oh, that treacherous breast! to whom weak youDid trust our counsels, and we both may rue,Having his falsehood found too late, 'twas heThat made me cast you guilty, and you me. Donne.
We take up with the most incompetent witnesses, nay, often suborn our own surmises and jealousies, that we may be sure to cast the unhappy criminal. Governm. of the Tongue, § 6.
He could not, in this forlorn case, have made use of the very last plea of a cast criminal; nor so much as have cried, Mercy! Lord, mercy! South.
There then we met; both try'd, and both were cast,And this irrevocable sentence past. Dryden's Theod. and Hon.
 To condemn in a law-suit. [from caster, Fr.]
The northern men were agreed, and, in effect, all the other, to cast our London escheatour. Camden's Remains.
Were the case referred to any competent judge, they would inevitably be cast. Decay of Piety.
 To defeat.
No martial project to surprise,Can ever be attempted twice;Nor cast design serve afterwards,As gamesters tear their losing cards. Hudibras, p. iii. c. iii.
 To cashier.
You are but now cast in his mood, a punishment more in policy than in malice; even so as one would beat his offenceless dog, to affright an imperious lion. Shakesp. Othello.
 To leave behind in a race.
In short, so swift your judgments turn and wind,You cast our fleetest wits a mile behind. Dryden.
 To shed; to let fall; to lay aside; to moult.
Our chariot lost her wheels, their points our spears,The bird of conquest her chief feather cast. Fairfax, b. iii.
Of plants some are green all winter, others cast their leaves. Bacon's Natural History, № 592.
The casting of the skin is, by the ancients, compared to the breaking curd of the secundine, or cawl, but not rightly; for that were to make every casting of the skin a new birth; and besides, the secundine is but a general cover, not shaped according to the parts, but the skin is shaped according to the parts.  The creatures that cast the skin, are the snake, the viper, the grashopper, the lizzard, the silkworm, &c. Bacon's Natural History, № 732.
O fertile head, which ev'ry yearCould such a crop of wonders bear!Which might it never have been cast,Each year's growth added to the last,These lofty branches had supply'dThe earth's bold sons prodigious pride. Waller.
The waving harvest bends beneath his blast,The forest shakes, the groves their honours cast. Dryden.
From hence, my lord, and love, I thus conclude,That though my homely ancestors were rude,Mean as I am, yet may I have the graceTo make you father of a generous race:And noble then am I, when I begin,In virtue cloath'd, to cast the rags of sin. Dryden's W. of B.
The ladies have been in a kind of moulting season, having cast great quantities of ribbon and cambrick, and reduced the human figure to the beautiful globular form. Addison. Spectator.
 To lay aside, as fit to be worn no longer.
So may cast poets write; there's no pretensionTo argue loss of wit, from loss of pension. Dryden's D. Seb.
He has ever been of opinion, that giving cast clothes to be worn by valets, has a very ill effect upon little minds. Addison.
 To have abortions; to bring forth before the time.
Thy ews and thy she-goats have not cast their young, and the rams of thy stock have I not eaten. Gen. xxxi. 38.
 To overweigh; to make to preponderate; to decide by overballancing.
Which being inclined, not constrained, contain within themselves the casting act, and a power to command the conclusion. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 13.
How much interest casts the balance in cases dubious. South.
Life and death are equal in themselves,That which could cast the balance, is thy falshood. Dryden.
Not many years ago, it so happened, that a cobler had the casting vote for the life of a criminal, which he very graciously gave on the merciful side. Addison on Italy.
Suppose your eyes sent equal raysUpon two distant pots of ale,In this sad state, your doubtful choiceWould never have the casting voice. Prior.
 To compute; to reckon; to calculate.
Hearts, tongues, figure, scribes, bards, poets, cannotThink, speak, cast, write, sing, number, ho!His love to Antony. Shakesp. Antony and Cleopatra.
Here is now the smith's note for shoeing and plow-irons. —Let it be cast and paid. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
You cast th' event of war, my noble lord,And summ'd th' account of chance, before you said,Let us make head. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
The best way to represent to life the manifold use of friendship, is to cast and see how many things there are, which a man cannot do himself. Bacon's Essays.
I have lately been casting in my thoughts the several unhappinesses of life, and comparing the infelicities of old age to those of infancy. Addison. Spectator, № 131.
 To contrive; to plan out.
The cloister facing the South, is covered with vines, and would have been proper for an orange-house; and had, I doubt not, been cast for that purpose, if this piece of gardening had been then in as much vogue as it is now. Temple.
 To judge; to consider in order to judgment.
            If thou couldst, doctor, castThe water of my land, find her disease,And purge it to a sound and pristine health,I would applaud thee to the very echo,That should applaud again. Shakesp. Macbeth.
Peace, brother, be not over exquisiteTo cast the fashion of uncertain evils. Milton.
 To fix the parts in a play.
Our parts in the other world will be new cast, and mankind will be there ranged in different stations of superiority. Addison. Spectator, № 219.
 To glance; to direct the eye.
Zelmanes's languishing countenance, with crossed arms, and sometimes cast up eyes, she thought to have an excellent grace. Sidney, b. ii.
                    As he past along,How earnestly he cast his eyes upon me. Shakesp. H. VIII.
Begin, auspicious boy, to cast aboutThy infant eyes, and, with a smile, thy mother single out. Dryden's Virgil, Past. iv.
Far eastward cast thine eye, from whence the sun,And orient science, at a birth begun. Pope's Dunciad.
He then led me to the rock, and, placing me on the top of it, Cast thy eyes eastward, said he, and tell me what thou seest. Addison, Spectator, № 159.
 To found; to form by running in a mould.
When any such curious work of silver is to be cast, as requires that the impression of hairs, or very slender lines, be taken off by the metal, it is not enough, that the silver be barely melted; but it must be kept a considerable while in a strong fusion. Boyle.
How to build ships, and dreadful ordnance cast,Instruct the artist. Waller.
        The father's grief restrain'd his art;He twice essay'd to cast his son in gold,Twice from his hands he dropp'd the forming mould. Dryden, Æneid vi.
 To melt metal into figures.
Yon' croud, he might reflect, yon' joyful croudWith restless rage would pull my statue down,And cast the brass anew to his renown. Prior.
This was but as a refiner's fire, to purge out the dross, and then cast the mass again into a new mould. Burnet's Theory.
 To model; to form.
We may take a quarter of a mile for the common measure of the depth of the sea, if it were cast into a channel of an equal depth every where. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
Under this influence, derived from mathematical studies, some have been tempted to cast all their logical, their metaphysical, and their theological and moral learning into this method. Watt's Logick.
 To communicate by reflection or emanation.
So bright a splendour, so divine a grace,The glorious Daphnis casts on his illustrious race. Dryden.
We may happen to find a fairer light cast over the same scriptures, and see reason to alter our sentiments even in some points of moment. Watt's Improvement of the Mind.
 To yield, or give up, without reserve or condition.
The reason of mankind cannot suggest any solid ground of satisfaction, but in making God our friend, and in carrying a conscience so clear, as may encourage us, with confidence, to cast ourselves upon him. South.
 To inflict.
The world is apt to cast great blame on those who have an indifferency for opinions, especially in religion. Locke.
 To cast away. To shipwreck.
Sir Francis Drake, and John Thomas, meeting with a storm, it thrust John Thomas upon the islands to the South, where he was cast away. Raleigh's Essays.
His father Philip had, by like mishap, been like to have been cast away upon the coast of England. Knolles's History.
With pity mov'd, for others cast awayOn rocks of hope and fears. Roscommon.
But now our fears tempestuous grow,And cast our hopes away;Whilst you, regardless of our woe,Sit careless at a play. Dorset.
 To cast away. To lavish; to waste in profusion; to turn to no use.
They that want means to nourish children, will abstain from marriage; or, which is all one, they cast away their bodies upon rich old women. Raleigh's Essays.
France, hast thou yet more blood to cast away?Say, shall the current of our right run on? Shakesp. K. J.
He might be silent, and not cast awayHis sentences in vain. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
O Marcia, O my sister, still there's hope!Our father will not cast away a life,So needful to us all, and to his country. Addison's Cato.
 To cast away. To ruin.
It is no impossible thing for states, by an oversight in some one act or treaty between them and their potent opposites, utterly to cast away themselves for ever. Hooker, b. iii. § 10.
 To cast down. To deject; to depress the mind.
                We're not the first,Who, with best meaning, have incurr'd the worst;For thee, oppressed king, I am cast down;Myself could else outfrown false fortune's frown. Shakesp. King Lear.
The best way will be to let him see you are much cast down, and afflicted, for the ill opinion he entertains of you. Addison. Spectator, № 171.
 To cast off. To discard; to put away.
The prince will, in the perfectness of time,Cast off his followers. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
He led me on to mightiest deeds,But now hath cast me off, as never known. Milt. Agonistes.
How! not call him father? I see preferment alters a man strangely; this may serve me for an use of instruction, to cast off my father, when I am great. Dryden's Spanish Friar.
        I long to clasp that haughty maid,And bend her stubborn virtue to my passion:When I have gone thus far, I'd cast her off. Addison's Cato.
 To cast off. To reject.
It is not to be imagined, that a whole society of men should publickly and professedly disown, and cast off a rule, which they could not but be infallibly certain was a law. Locke.
 To cast off. To disburden one's self of.
All conspired in one to cast off their subjection to the crown of England. Spenser's State of Ireland.
This maketh them, through an unweariable desire of receiving instruction, to cast off the care of those very affairs, which do most concern their estate. Hooker, Preface.
The true reason why any man is an atheist, is because he is a wicked man: religion would curb him in his lusts; and therefore he casts it off, and puts all the scorn upon it he can. Tillotson, Serm. ii.
Company, in any action, gives credit and countenance to the agent; and so much as the sinner gets of this, so much he casts off of shame. South.
We see they never fail to exert themselves, and to cast off the oppression, when they feel the weight of it. Addison.
 To cast off. To leave behind.
Away he scours cross the fields, casts off the dogs, and gains a wood; but, pressing through a thicket, the bushes held him by the horns, till the hounds came in, and plucked him down. L'Estrange, Fab. xliii.
 To cast off. [hunting term.] To let go, or set free; as, to cast off the dogs.

 To cast out. To reject; to turn out of doors.
Thy brat hath been cast out, like to itself, no father owning it. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
 To cast out. To vent; to speak; with some intimation of negligence or vehemence.
Why dost thou cast out such ungenerous termsAgainst the lords and sovereigns of the world? Add. Cato.
 To cast up. To compute; to calculate.
Some writers, in casting up the goods most desirable in life, hath given them this rank, health, beauty, and riches. Temple.
A man who designs to build, is very exact, as he supposes, in casting up the cost beforehand; but, generally speaking, he is mistaken in his account. Dryden's Fab. Preface.
 To cast up. To vomit.
Thou, beastly feeder, art so full of him,That thou provok'st thyself to cast him up. Shakesp. H. IV.
Their villainy goes against my weak stomach, and therefore I must cast it up. Shakesp. Henry V.
O, that in time Rome did not castHer errours up, this fortune to prevent. Ben. Johnson's Catil.
                Thy foolish errour find;Cast up the poison that infects thy mind. Dryden.

Cat (1)
Cat. n.s. [katz, Teuton. chat, Fr.] A domestick animal that catches mice, commonly reckoned by naturalists the lowest order of the leonine species.
            'Twas you incens'd the rabble: Cats, that can judge as fitly of his worth, As I can of those mysteries, which heav'n Will not have earth to know. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 Thrice the brinded cat hath mew'd. Shakesp. Macbeth.
 A cat, as she beholds the light, draws the ball of her eye small and long, being covered over with a green skin, and dilates it at pleasure. Peacham on Drawing.

Catachresis
Catachrésis. n.s. [κατάχρησις, abuse.] It is, in rhetorick, the abuse of a trope, when the words are too far wrested from their native signification, or when one word is abusively put for another, for want of the proper word; as, a voice beautiful to the ear. Smith's Rhetorick.

Catachrestical
Catachréstical. adj. [from catachresis.] Contrary to proper use; forced; far fetched.
A catachrestical and far derived similitude it holds with men, that is, in a bifurcation. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Cataclysm
Cátaclysm. n.s. [κατακλύσμος.] A deluge; an inundation; used generally for the universal deluge.
 The opinion that held these cataclysms and empyroses universal, was such, as held, that it put a total consummation unto things in this lower world. Hale's Origin of Mankind.

Catacombs
Cátacombs. n.s. [from κατὰ and κομβος, a hollow or cavity.] Subterraneous cavities for the burial of the dead; of which there are a great number about three miles from Rome, supposed to be the caves and cells where the primitive christians hid and assembled themselves, and where they interred the martyrs, which are accordingly visited with devotion. But, anciently, the word catacomb was only understood of the tombs of St. Peter and St. Paul; and Mr. Monro, in the Philosophical Transactions, supposes the catacombs to have been originally the sepulchres of the first Romans. Places like these might afford convenient resortments to the primitive christians, but could never be built by them. Chambers.

Catagmatick
Catagmátick. adj. [κάταγμα, a fracture.] That which has the quality of consolidating the parts.
 I put on a catagmatick emplaster, and, by the use of a laced glove, scattered the pituitous swelling, and strengthened it. Wiseman's Surgery.

Caw
To Caw. v.n. [taken from the sound.] To cry as the rook, raven, or crow.
Russet-pated choughs, many in sort,Rising and cawing at the gun's report. Shakesp.
There is a walk of aged elms, so very high, that the rooks and crows upon the tops seem to be cawing in another region. Addison. Spectator, № 110.
The rook, who high amid the boughsIn early spring, his airy city builds,And ceaseless caws. Thomson's Spring.

Celestial (adjective)


Celestial (noun)
Cele'stial. n.s. [from the adj.] An inhabitant of heaven.
Thus affable and mild, the prince procedes, And to the dome th' unknown celestial. leads. Pope's Odyssey.

Celestially
Cele'stially. adv. [from celestial.] In a heavenly manner.

Celestify
To Celéstify. v.a. [from celestis, Lat.] To give something of heavenly nature to any thing.
 We should affirm, that all things were in all things, that heaven were but earth terrestrified, and earth but heaven celestrified, or that each part above had influence upon its affinity below. Brown's Vulgar Errours.

Celiack
Céliack. adj. [κοιλία, the belly.]  Relating to the lower belly.
 The blood moving slowly through the celiack and mesenterick arteries, produce complaints. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Celibacy
Célibacy. n.s. [from cælebs, Latin.] Single life; unmarried state.
 I can attribute their numbers to nothing but their frequent marriages; for they look on celibacy as an accursed state, and generally are married before twenty. Spectator, № 495.
 By  teaching them how to carry themselves in their relations of husband and wives, parents and children, they have, without question, adorned the gospel, glorified God, and benefited man, much more than they could have done in the devoutest and strictest celibacy. Atterbury.

Celibate
Célibate. n.s. [cælibatus, Lat.] Single life.
 Where polygamy is forbidden, the males oblige themselves to celibate, and then multiplication is hindered. Graunt.

Cell
Cell. n.s. [cella, Lat.]

 A small cavity or hollow place.
 The brain contains ten thousand cells, In each some active fancy dwells. Prior.
 How these for ever, though a monarch reign, Their sep'rate cells and properties maintain. Pope.
 The cave or little habitation of a religious person.
 Besides, she did intend confession At Patrick's cell this even; and there she was not. Shakesp.
 Then did religion in a lazy cell, In empty, airy contemplations dwell. Denham.
 A small and close apartment in a prison.

 Any small place of residence.
 Mine eyes he clos'd, but open left the cell Of fancy, my internal sight. Par. Lost, b. viii. l. 460.
 Little bags or bladders, where fluids, or matter of different sorts are lodged; common both to animals and plants. Quincy.

Cellar
Céllar. n.s. [cella, Lat.] A place under ground, where stores are reposited.
 If this fellow had lived in the time of Cato, he would, for his punishment, have been confined to the bottom of a cellar during his life. Peacham on Drawing.

Chair


Chamade
Chamáde. n.s. [French.] The beat of the drum which declares a surrender.
 Several French battalions made a shew of resistance; but, upon our preparing to fill up a little fossé, in order to attack them, they beat the chamade, and sent us charte blanche. Addison. Spectator, № 165.

Chambrel of a Horse
Chámbrel of a Horse. The joint or bending of the upper part of the hinder leg. Farrier's Dict.

Chant (noun)
Chant. n.s. [from the verb.] Song; melody.
                        A pleasant grove,With chant of tuneful birds resounding loud. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii. l. 290.

Chant (verb active)
To Chant. v.a. [chanter, Fr.]

 To sing.
Wherein the chearful birds of sundry kindDo chant sweet musick. Fairy Queen, b. i. c. vii.
 To celebrate by song.
The poets chant it in the theatres, the shepherds in the mountains. Bramhall.
 To sing in the cathedral service.

Chant (verb neuter)
To Chant. v.n. To sing; to make melody with the voice.
They chant to the sound of the viol, and invent to themselves instruments of musick. Amos, vi. 7.
Heav'n heard his song, and hasten'd his relief;And chang'd to snowy plumes his hoary hair,And wing'd his flight, to chant aloft in air. Dryden.

Chanter
Chánter. n.s. [from chant.] A singer; a songster.
You curious chanters of the wood,That warble forth dame Nature's lays. Wotton.
        Jove's etherial lays, resistless fire,The chanter's soul, and raptur'd song inspire,Instinct divine! nor blame severe his choice,Warbling the Grecian woes with harp and voice. Pope.

Chanticleer
Chánticleer. n.s. [from chanter and clair, Fr.] The name given to the cock, from the clearness and loudness of his crow.
And chearful chanticleer, with his note shrill,Had warned once, that Phœbus' firy carIn haste was climbing up the eastern hill. Fairy Queen, b. i.
        Hark, hark, I hearThe strain of strutting chanticleer. Shakesp. Tempest.
Stay, the chearful chanticleerTells you that the time is near. Ben. Johnson's Mask.
These verses were mentioned by Chaucer, in the description of the sudden stir, and panical fear, when Chanticleer the cock was carried away by Reynold the fox. Camden's Remains.
Within this homestead liv'd without a peer,For crowing loud, the noble chanticleer. Dryden's Fab.

Chantress
Chántress. n.s. [from chant.] A woman singer.
Sweet bird, that shun'st the noise of folly,Most musical, most melancholy,Thee, chantress of the woods among,I woo to hear thy even-song. Milton.

Chantry
Chántry. n.s. [from chant.]
Chantry is a church or chapel endowed with lands, or other yearly revenue, for the maintenance of one or more priests, daily to sing mass for the souls of the donors, and such others as they appoint. Cowel.
Now go with me, and with this holy man,Into the chantry by; to those before him,And, underneath that consecrated roof,Plight me the full assurance of your faith. Shakesp. T. Night.

Chaos
Cháos. n.s. [chaos, Lat. χάος.]

 The mass of matter supposed to be in confusion before it was divided by the creation into its proper classes and elements.
The whole universe would have been a confused chaos, without beauty or order. Bentley.
 Confusion; irregular mixture.
Had I followed the worst, I could not have brought church and state to such a chaos of confusions, as some have done. K. Charles.
Their reason sleeps, but mimick fancy wakes,Supplies her parts, and wild ideas takesFrom words and things, ill sorted, and misjoin'd,The anarchy of thought, and chaos of the mind. Dryden.
 Any thing where the parts are undistinguished.
We shall have nothing but darkness and a chaos within, whatever order and light there be in things without us. Locke.
Pleas'd with a work, where nothing's just or fit,One glaring chaos and wild heap of wit. Pope.

Chaotick
Chaótick. adj. [from chaos.] Resembling chaos; confused.
When the terraqueous globe was in a chaotick state, and the earthy particles subsided, then those several beds were, in all probability, reposited in the earth. Derham's Physico-Theology.

Cheek
Cheek. n.s. [ceac, Saxon.]

 The side of the face below the eye.
 And now and then an ample tear trill'd down Her delicate cheek. Shakesp. King Lear.
 Her beauty hangs upon the cheek of night, Like a rich jewel in an Æthiop's ear. Shakesp. Rom. and Jul.
                 I shall survey and spy Death in thy cheeks, and darkness in thy eye. Donne.
 Daughter of the rose, whose cheeks unite The diff'ring titles of the red and white, Who heaven's alternate beauty well display The blush of morning and the milky way. Dryden.
 A  general name among mechanicks for almost all those pieces of their machines and instruments that are double, and perfectly alike. Chambers.

Cheekbone
Cheekbone. n.s. [from cheek and bone.]
 I cut afterwards into the tumour, and felt the slug: it lay partly under the os jugale, or cheekbone. Wiseman.

Cheese


Cheesecake


Cherish


Cherisher
Che'risher. n.s. [from cherish] An encourager; a supporter.
One of the greatest praises it is to be the maintainers and cherishers of a regular devotion, a reverend worship, a true and decent piety. Sprat's Serm.

Cherishment
Che'rishment. n.s. [from cherish.] Encouragement; support; comfort. It is now obsolete.
The one lives, her age's ornament, That with rich bounty and dear cherishment, Supports the praise of noble poesie. Spenser's Tears of the Muses.

Cherry (adjective)
Che'rry. adj. [from the substantive.] Resembling a cherry in colour.
                 Shore's wife hath a pretty foot, A cherry lip, a passing pleasing tongue. Shakes. Rich. III.

Cherry (noun)
Che'rry. n.s.Che'rry-tree. n.s.

 [cerise, Fr. cerasus, Lat.]


The tree hath large shining leaves: the fruit grows on long pedicles, and is roundish or heart-shaped: the stone is short, tumid, and roundish. The species are; 1. The common red or garden cherry. 2. Large Spanish cherry. 3. The red heart cherry. 4. The white heart cherry. 5. The bleeding heart cherry. 6. The black heart cherry. 7. The May cherry. 8. The black cherry, or mazard. 9. The archduke cherry. 10. The yellow Spanish cherry. 11. The Flanders cluster cherry. 12. The carnation cherry. 13. The large black cherry. 14. The bird cherry. 15. The red bird or Cornish cherry. 16. The largest double flowered cherry. 17. The double flowered cherry. 18. The common wild cherry. 19. The wild northern English cherry, with late ripe fruit. 20. The shock or perfumed cherry. 21. The cherrytree with striped leaves. And many other sorts of cherries; as the amber cherry, lukeward, corone, Gascoigne, and the morello, which is chiefly planted for preserving.
This fruit was brought out of Pontus at the time of the Mithridatick victory, by Lucullus, in the year of Rome 680; and was brought into Britain about 120 years afterwards; which was An. Dom. 55; and was soon after spread through most parts of Europe. It is generally esteemed for its earliness, being of the first tree-fruits that appears to welcome in the fruit-season. Miller
Some devils ask but the parings of one's nail, a pin, a nut, a cherry stone; but she, more covetous, would have a chain. Shakes. Com. of Errors.
July I would have drawn in a jacket of light-yellow eating cherries, with his face and bosom sun-burnt. Peacham.
All this done by a little spark of life, which, in its first appearance, might be inclosed in the hollow of a cherry stone. Hale's Orig. of Mankind.
All the ideas of all the sensible qualities of a cherry come into my mind by sensation. Locke.

Cherry Bay
Che'rry bay. See Laurel.

Cherry-tree
Che'rry. n.s.Che'rry-tree. n.s.

 [cerise, Fr. cerasus, Lat.]


The tree hath large shining leaves: the fruit grows on long pedicles, and is roundish or heart-shaped: the stone is short, tumid, and roundish. The species are; 1. The common red or garden cherry. 2. Large Spanish cherry. 3. The red heart cherry. 4. The white heart cherry. 5. The bleeding heart cherry. 6. The black heart cherry. 7. The May cherry. 8. The black cherry, or mazard. 9. The archduke cherry. 10. The yellow Spanish cherry. 11. The Flanders cluster cherry. 12. The carnation cherry. 13. The large black cherry. 14. The bird cherry. 15. The red bird or Cornish cherry. 16. The largest double flowered cherry. 17. The double flowered cherry. 18. The common wild cherry. 19. The wild northern English cherry, with late ripe fruit. 20. The shock or perfumed cherry. 21. The cherrytree with striped leaves. And many other sorts of cherries; as the amber cherry, lukeward, corone, Gascoigne, and the morello, which is chiefly planted for preserving.
This fruit was brought out of Pontus at the time of the Mithridatick victory, by Lucullus, in the year of Rome 680; and was brought into Britain about 120 years afterwards; which was An. Dom. 55; and was soon after spread through most parts of Europe. It is generally esteemed for its earliness, being of the first tree-fruits that appears to welcome in the fruit-season. Miller
Some devils ask but the parings of one's nail, a pin, a nut, a cherry stone; but she, more covetous, would have a chain. Shakes. Com. of Errors.
July I would have drawn in a jacket of light-yellow eating cherries, with his face and bosom sun-burnt. Peacham.
All this done by a little spark of life, which, in its first appearance, might be inclosed in the hollow of a cherry stone. Hale's Orig. of Mankind.
All the ideas of all the sensible qualities of a cherry come into my mind by sensation. Locke.

Cherrycheeked
Che'rrycheeked. adj. [from cherry and cheek.] Having ruddy cheeks.
I warrant them cherrycheek'd country girls. Cong. Old Bat.

Cherrypit
Che'rrypit. n.s. [from cherry and pit.] A child's play, in which they throw cherry stones into a small hole.
What! man, 'tis not for gravity to play at cherrypit. Shakesp. Twelfth Night.

Cheslip
Che'slip. n.s. A small vermin, that lies under stones or tiles. Skinner

Chess
Chess. n.s. [echec, Fr.] A nice and abstruse game, in which two sets of men are moved in opposition to each other.
This game the Persian magi did invent, The force of Eastern wisdom to express; From thence to busy Europeans sent, And styl'd by modern Lombards pensive chess. Denham.
So have I seen a king on chess, (His rooks and knights withdrawn, His queen and bishops in distress) Shifting about, grow less and less, With here and there a pawn. Dryden.

Chess-apple
Che'ss-apple. n.s. See Wild Service, of which it is a species.

Chess-board
Che'ss-board. n.s. [from chess and board.] The board or table on which the game of chess is plaid.
And cards are dealt, and chessboards brought,
To ease the pain of coward thought. Prior.

Chess-man
Che'ss-man. n.s. [from chess and man.] A puppet for chess.
A company of chessmen, standing on the same squares of the chessboard where we left them: we say, they are all in the same place, or unmoved. Locke.

Chess-player
Che'ss-player. n.s. [from chess and player.] A gamester at chess.
Thus like a skilful chessplayer, by little and little, he draws out his men, and makes his pawn of use to his greater persons. Dryden on Dramatick Poesy.

Chest (noun)
Chest. n.s. [cẏꞅꞇ, Sax. cista, Lat.]

 A box of wood or other materials, in which things are laid up.
 He will seek there, on my word: neither press, chest, trunk, well, vault, but he hath an abstract for the remembrance of such places. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 But more have been by avarice opprest, And heaps of money crowded in the chest. Dryd. Juv. Sat.
 A Chest of Drawers. A case with boxes or drawers.

 The trunk of the body, or cavity from the shoulders to the belly.
 Such as have round faces, or broad chests, or shoulders, have seldom or never long necks. Brown's Vul. Err. b. vii. c. 14.
 He describes another by the largeness of his chest, and breadth of his shoulders. Pope's Notes on the Iliad.

Chest (verb)
To Chest. v.a. [from the noun.] To reposite in a chest; to hoard.

Childless


Chiliad
Chíliad. n.s. [from χιλιας.] A thousand; a collection or sum containing a thousand.
 We make cycles and periods of years; as decads, centuries, chiliads, &c. for the use of computation in history. Holder.

Chiliaedron
Chiliáedron. n.s. [from χιλια.] A figure of a  thousand sides.
 In a man, who speaks of a chiliaedron, or a body of a thousand sides, the idea of the figure may be very confused, though that of the number be very distinct. Locke.

Chocolate
Chócolate. n.s. [chocolate, Span.]

 The nut of the cacao-tree.
The tree hath a rose flower, of a great number of petals, from whose empalement arises the pointal, being a tube cut into many parts, which becomes a fruit shaped somewhat like a cucumber, and deeply furrowed, in which are contained several seeds, collected into an oblong heap, and slit down, somewhat like almonds.  It is a native of America, and is found in great plenty in several places between the Tropicks, and grows wild.  See Cocoa. Miller.
 The cake or mass, made by grinding the kernel of the cacao-nut with other substances, to be dissolved in hot water.
 The Spaniards were the first who brought chocolate into use in Europe, to promote the consumption of their cacao-nuts, achiot, and other drugs, which their West Indies furnish, and which enter the composition of chocolate. Chambers.
 The liquor, made by a solution of chocolate in hot water.
 Chocolate is certainly much the best of these three exotick liquors: its oil seems to be both rich, alimentary, and anodyne. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 In fumes of burning chocolate shall glow, And tremble at the sea that froths below! Pope.

Christmas
Chrístmas. n.s. [from Christ and mass.] The day on which the nativity of our blessed Saviour is celebrated, by the particular service of the church.

Churl


Cion


Clad
Clad. part. pret. [This participle, which is now referred to clothe, seems originally to have belonged to cloden, or some such word, like kleeden, Dutch.] Clothed; invested; garbed.
He had clad himself with a new garment. 1 Kings xi. 29.
                        BeyondThe flow'ry dale of Sibma, clad with vine. Milt. Par. Lost.
But virtue too, as well as vice, is cladIn flesh and blood. Waller.
To her the weeping heav'ns become serence;For her the ground is clad in cheerful green. Dryden.
The courtiers were all most magnificiently clad. Swift.

Clench
Clench. See Clinch.

Clepe
To Clepe. v.a. [clẏpian, Saxon.] To call. Obsolete.
Three crabbed months had sowr'd themselves to death,Ere I could make thee open thy white hand,And clepe thyself my love. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.

Clinch (noun)
Clinch. n.s. [from the verb.]

 A word used in a double meaning; a pun; an ambiguity; a duplicity of meaning, with an identity of expression.
 Such as they are, I hope they will prove, without a clinch, luciferous searching after the nature of light. Boyle.
 Pure clinches the suburbian muse affords, And Panton waging harmless war with words. Dryden.
 Here one poor word a hundred clinches makes. Pope.
 That part of the cable which is fastened to the ring of the anchor.

Clinch (verb)
To Clinch. v.a. [clẏniʒa, Sax. to knock, Junius. Clingo, in Festus, to encompass, Minshew.]

 To hold in the hand with the fingers bent over it.
         Simois rowls the bodies and the shields Of heroes, whose dismember'd hands yet bear The dart aloft, and clinch the pointed spear. Dryd. Virg. Æn.
 To contract or double the fingers.
 Their tallest trees are about seven feet high, the tops whereof I could but just reach with my fist clinched. Swift.
 To bend the point of a nail in the other side.

 To confirm; to fix; as, to clinch an argument.

Clink (verb neuter)
To Clink. v.n. To utter a small, sharp, interrupted noise.
                         The sever'd bars, Submissive, clink against your brazen portals. Prior.
 Safe thro' the wet on clinking pattens tread. Gay's Trivia.

Cloth
Cloth. n.s. plural cloths or clothes. [clað, Saxon.]

 Any thing woven for dress or covering, whether of animal or vegetable substance.
The Spaniards buy their linen cloths in that kingdom. Swift.
 The piece of linen spread upon a table.
Nor let, like Nævius, every error pass,The musty wine, foul cloth; or greasy glass. Pope's Hor. Imit.
 The canvas on which pictures are delineated.
I answer you right painted cloth, from whence you have studied your questions. Shakesp. As you like it.
Who fears a sentence, or an old man's saw,Shall by a painted cloth be kept in awe. Shak. Tarq. and Luc.
This idea, which we may call the goddess of painting and of sculpture, descends upon the marble and the cloth, and becomes the original of these arts. Dryden's Pref. to Dufresnoy.
 In the plural. Dress; habit; garment; vesture; vestments.  Including whatever covering is worn on the body.  In this sense always clothes. Pronounced clo's.
He with him brought Pryene, rich array'dIn Claribellae's clothes. Spenser, b. ii. cant. 4. stanz. 28.
Take up these clothes here, quickly: carry them to the laundress in Datchet-mead. Shakes. Merry Wives of Windsor.
Strength grows more from the warmth of exercises than of cloaths. Temple.
 The covering of a bed.
Gazing on her midnight foes,She turn'd each way her frighted head,Then sunk it deep beneath the clothes. Prior.

Clothe
To Clothe. v.a. pret. I clothed, or clad; particip. I have clothed, or clad. [from cloth.]

 To invest with garments; to cover with dress, from cold and injuries.
Care no more to clothe and eat. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
An inhabitant of Nova Zembla having lived in Denmark, where he was clothed, took the first opportunity of making his escape into nakedness. Addison's Freeholder, № 5.
The Britons in Cæsar's time painted their bodies, and clothed themselves with the skins of beasts. Swift.
With superior boon may your rich soilExuberant nature's better blessings pourO'er every land, the naked nations clothe,And be th' exhaustless granary of a world. Thoms. Spring.
 To adorn with dress.
We clothe and adorn our bodies: indeed, too much time we bestow upon that.  Our souls also are to be clothed with holy habits, and adorned with good works. Ray on Creation.
Embroider'd purple clothes the golden beds. Pope's Statius.
 To invest; as with clothes.
They leave the shady realms of night,And, cloth'd in bodies, breathe your upper light. Dryden.
Let both use the clearest language in which they can clothe their thoughts. Watt's Improvement of the Mind, p. i.
 To furnish or provide with clothes.

Clown
Clown. n.s. [imagined by Skinner and Junius to be contracted from colonus.  It seems rather a Saxon word, corrupted from lown; loen, Dut. a word nearly of the same import.]

 A rustick; a country fellow; a churl.
He came out with all his clowns, horst upon cart-jades. Sidney, b. ii.
The clowns, a boist'rous, rude, ungovern'd crew,With furious haste to the loud summons flew. Dryden's Æn.
 A coarse ill-bred man.
In youth a coxcomb, and in age a clown. Spectator.
A country squire, represented with no other vice but that of being a clown, and having the provincial accent. Swift.

Clownery
Clównery. n.s. [from clown.] Ill-breeding; churlishness; rudeness; brutality.
The fool's conceit had both clownery and ill-nature. L'Estr.

Clownish
Clównish. adj. [from clown.]

 Consisting of rusticks or clowns.
Young Silvia beats her breast, and cries aloudFor succour from the clownish neighbourhood. Dryd. Æn.
 Coarse; rough; rugged.
But with his clownish hands their tender wingsHe brushed off. Spenser's Fairy Queen, b. i. cant. i.
 Uncivil; ill-bred; ill-mannered.
            What if we essay'd to stealThe clownish fool out of your father's court. Shakespeare.
 Clumsly; ungainly.
With a grave look, in this odd equipage,The clownish mimick traverses the stage. Prior.

Cloy
To Cloy. v.a. [enclouer, Fr. To nail up; to stop up.]

 To satiate; to sate; to fill beyond desire; to surfeit; to fill to loathing.
The length of those speeches had not cloyed Pyrocles, though he were very impatient of long deliberations. Sidney.
The very creed of Athanasius, and that sacred hymn of glory, are now reckoned as superfluities, which we must in any case pare away, lest we cloy God with too much service. Hooker, b. v. sect. 42.
Who can cloy the hungry edge of appetite,By bare imagination of a feast? Shakeps. Richard II.
Continually varying the same sense, and taking up what he had more than enough inculcated before, he sometimes cloys his readers instead of satisfying them. Dryden.
Whose little store her well-taught mind does please,Nor pinch'd with want, nor cloy'd with wanton ease. Roscom.
Intemperance in eating and drinking, instead of delighting and satisfying nature, doth but load and cloy it. Tillotson.
Settle, cloy'd with custard and with praise,Is gather'd to the dull of ancient days. Pope's Dunciad.
 It seems to have, in the following passage, another sense: perhaps to strike the beak together.
              His royal birdPrunes the immortal wings, and cloys his beak,As when his god is pleas'd. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 To nail up guns, by striking a spike into the touch-hole.

Cock (composition)
Cock. in composition, signifies small or little.

Cock (noun)
Cock. n.s. [cocc, Saxon ; coq, French.]

 The male to the hen ; a domestick fowl, remarkable for his gallantry, pride, and courage.
 Cocks have great combs and spurs; hens, little or none. Bacon's Natural History, №. 85.
                      True cocks o' th' game, That never ask for what, or whom, they fight; But turn 'em out, and shew 'em but a foe, Cry liberty, and that's a cause of quarrel. Dryd. Span. Fryar.
                              The careful hen, Calls all her chirping family around, Fed and defended by the fearless cock. Thomson's Spring.
 The male of any small birds.
 He was confirmed in this by observing, that calves and philosophers, tygers and statesmen, cock sparrows and coquets, exactly resemble one another in the formation of the pineal gland. Arbuth. and Pope's Mart. Scrib.
 The weathercock, that shews the direction of the wind by turning.
 You cataracts and hurricanoes spout, 'Till you have drench'd our steeples, drown'd the cocks! Shakespeare's King Lear.
 A spout to let out water at will, by turning the stop.
                            When every room  Hath blaz'd with lights, and bray'd with minstrelsy, I have retir'd me to a wasteful cock, And set mine eyes at flow. Shakespeare's Timon.
 It were good there were a little cock made in the belly of the upper glass. Bacon's Natural History, № 16.
 Thus the small jett, which hasty hands unlock, Spirts in the gard'ner's eyes who turns the cock. Pope's Dunc.
 The notch of an arrow.

 The part of the lock of a gun that strikes with the flint. [From cocca, Ital. the notch of an arrow. Skinner. Perhaps from the action, like that of a cock pecking.]
                      With a hasty rage he snatch'd His gunshot, that in holsters watch'd, And bending cock, he levell'd full Against th' outside of Talgol's skull. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 2.
 A seven-shot gun carries powder and bullets for seven charges and discharges. Under the breech of the barrel is one box for the powder; a little before the lock another for the bullets; behind the cock a charger, which carries the powder from the box to a funnel at the further end of the lock. Grew.
 A conqueror ; a leader ; a governing man.
 Sir Andrew is grown the cock of the club since he left us. Addison's Spectator, №. 130.
 My schoolmaster call'd me a dunce and a fool; But at cuffs I was always the cock of the school. Swift.
 Cockcrowing; a note of the time in a morning.
 We were carousing 'till the second cock. Shakes. Macbeth.
 He begins at curfew, and goes 'till the first cock. Shakesp.
 A cockboat; a small boat.
 They take view of all sized cocks, barges, and fisherboats hovering on the coast. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.
 The fishermen that walk upon the beach, Appear like mice; and yond tall anchoring bark, Diminish'd to her cock; her cock, a buoy, Almost too small for sight. Shakesp. King Lear.
 A small heap of hay. [Properly cop.]
 As soon as the dew is off the ground spread the hay again, and turn it, that it may wither on the other side: then handle it, and, if you find it dry, make it up into cocks. Mortimer.
 The form of a hat. [From the comb of the cock.]
 You may see many a smart rhetorician turning his hat in his hands, moulding it into several different cocks. Addison's Spectator, №. 408.
 The style or gnomon of a dial. Chambers..

 The needle of a balance.

 Cock on the Hoop. Triumphant; exulting.
 Now I am a striker, all men on me look; What should I do but set cock on the hoop?. Camden's Remains.
 You'll make a mutiny among my guests! You will set cock a hoop! Shakesp. Romeo and Juliet.
 For Hudibras, who thought h' had won The field, as certain as a gun, And having routed the whole troop, With victory was cock a hoop. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 3.

Cock (verb active)
To Cock. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To set erect; to hold bolt upright, as a cock holds his head.
 This is that muscle which performs the motion so often mentioned by the Latin poets, when they talk of a man's cocking his nose, or playing the rhinoceros. Addison's Spect.
 Our Lightfoot barks, and cocks his ears; O'er yonder stile see Lubberkin appears. Gay's Pastorals.
 Dick would cock his nose in scorn, But Tom was kind and loving. Swift.
 To set up the hat with an air of petulance and pertness.
 Dick, who thus long had passive sat, Here strok'd his chin and cock'd his hat. Prior.
 An alert young fellow cock'd his hat upon a friend of his who entered. Addison's Spectator, №. 403.
 To mould the form of the hat.

 To fix the cock of a gun ready for a discharge.
 Some of them holding up their pistols cocked, near the door of the house, which they kept open. Dryd. Dedicat. Æn.
 To raise hay in small heaps.
 Sike mirth in May is meetest for to make, Or summer shade, under the cocked hay. Spenser's Pastorals.

Cock (verb neuter)
Cock. v.n.

 To strut; to hold up the head, and look big, or menacing, or pert.
 Sir Fopling is a fool so nicely writ, The ladies would mistake him for a wit; And when he sings, talks loud, and cocks, would cry, I vow, methinks, he's pretty company. Dryden.
 Every one cocks and struts upon it, and pretends to overlook us. Addison's Guardian, №. 108.
 To train or use fighting cocks.
 Cries out 'gainst cocking, since he cannot bet. B. Johnson.

Cocoa (1)
Cócoa. n.s. See Cacao.

Cocoa (2)
Cocoa. n.s. [cacaotal, Span. and therefore more properly written cacao.]
A species of palm-tree, cultivated in most of the inhabited parts of the East and West Indies; but thought a native of the Maldives.  It is one of the most useful trees to the inhabitants of America.  The bark of the nut is made into cordage, and the shell into drinking bowls.  The kernel of the nut affords them a wholesome food, and the milk contained in the shell a cooling liquor.  The leaves of the trees are used for thatching their houses, and are also wrought into baskets, and most other things that are made of osiers in Europe. Miller.
The cacao or chocolate nut is a fruit of an oblong figure, much resembling a large olive in size and shape.  It is composed of a thin but hard and woody coat or skin, of a dark blackish colour; and of a dry kernel, filling up its whole cavity, fleshy, dry, firm, and fattish to the touch, of a dusky colour, an agreeable smell, and a pleasant and peculiar taste.  It was uknown to us 'till the discovery of America, where the natives not only drank the liquor made from the nuts, in the manner we do chocolate, but also used them as money.  The tree is not very tall, but grows regularly, and is of a beautiful form, especially when loaded with its fruit.  Its stem is of the thickness of a man's leg, and but a few feet in height; its bark rough, and full of tubercles; and its leaves six or eight inches long, half as much in breadth, and pointed at the ends.  The flowers stand on the branches, and even on the trunk of the tree, in clusters, each having its own pedicle, an inch and sometimes less in length: they are small, of a yellowish colour, and are succeeded by the fruit, which is large and oblong, resembling a cucumber, five, six, or eight inches in length, and three or four in thickness; and, when fully ripe, it is of a purple colour.  Within the cavity of this fruit are lodged the cocoa nuts, usually about thirty in number.  This tree flowers twice or three times in the year, and ripens as many series of fruits. Hill's History of the Mat. Medica.
         Amid'those orchards of the sun, Give me to drain the cocoa's milky bowl, And from the palm to draw its freshening wine. Thomson.

Coif
Coif. n.s. [coeffe, French, from cofea, for cucufa, low Latin.] The head-dress; a lady's cap; the serjeant's cap.
The judges of the four circuits in Wales, although they are not of the first magnitude, nor need be of the degree of the coif, yet are they considerable. Bacon's Advice to Villiers.
No less a man than a brother of the coif began his suit, before he had been a twelvemonth at the Temple. Addis. Spect.

Coil (noun)
Coil. n.s. [kolleren, Germ.]

 Tumult; turmoil; bustle; stir; hurry; confusion.
Who was so firm, so constant, that this coilWould not infect his reason. Shakeps. Tempest.
You, mistress, all this coil is 'long of you. Shakespeare.
In that sleep of death what dreams may come,When we have shuffled off this mortal coil,Must give us pause. Shakespeare's Hamlet.
 A rope wound into a ring.

Coil (verb)
To Coil. v.a. [cueillir, French.] To gather into a narrow compass; as to coil a rope, to wind it in a ring.
The lurking particles of air so expanding themselves, must necessarily plump out the sides of the bladder, and so keep them turgid, until the pressure of the air, that at first coiled them, be re-admitted to do the same thing again. Boyle.

Colbertine
Cólbertine. n.s. A kind of lace worn by women.
 Go, hang out an old frisoneer gorget, with a yard of yellow colbertine again. Congreve's Way of the World.

Cold (adjective)
Cold. adj. [cold, Saxon; kalt, German.]

 Not hot; not warm; gelid; without warmth; without heat.
 The diet in the state of manhood ought to be solid; and their chief drink water cold, because in such a state it has its own natural spirit. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 Chill; shivering; having sense of cold.
                 O noble English, that could entertain, With half their force, the full power of France; And let another half stand laughing by, All out of work, and cold for action. Shakes. Henry V.
 Having cold qualities; not volatile; not acrid.
 Cold plants have a quicker perception of the heat of the sun than the hot herbs; as a cold hand will sooner find a little warmth than an hot. Bacon's Natural History, №. 577.
 Unaffected; frigid; without passion; without zeal; without concern; unactive; unconcerned.
 There sprung up one kind of men, with whose zeal and forwardness the rest being compared, were thought to be marvellous cold and dull. Hooker, Preface, s. 8.
 Infinite shall be made cold in religion, by your example, that never were hurt by reading books. Ascham's Schoolmaster.
 Temp'rately proceed to what you would Thus violently redress. — Sir, these cold ways, That seem like prudent helps, are very poisonous. Shakesp.
             New dated letters these, Their cold intent, tenour and substance thus; Here doth he wish his person, and his power, The which he could not levy. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
 We should not, when the blood was cold, have threatened Our prisoners with the sword. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
 To see a world in flames, and an host of angels in the clouds, one must be much of a stoick to be a cold and unconcerned spectator. Burnet's Preface to the Theory of the Earth.
 No drum or trumpet needs T' inspire the coward, or to warm the cold, His voice, his sole appearance, makes them bold. Dryden.
 O, thou hast touch'd me with thy sacred theme, And my cold heart is kindled at thy flame. Rowe.
 A man must be of a very cold or degenerate temper, whose heart doth not burn within him in the midst of praise and adoration. Addison's Freeholder, №. 49.
 Unaffecting; unable to move the passions.
 The rabble are pleased at the first entry of a disguise; but the jest grows cold even with them too, when it comes on in a second scene. Addison's Remarks on Italy.
 Reserved; coy; not affectionate; not cordial; not friendly.
             Let his knights have colder looks Among you. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 The commissioners grew more reserved and colder towards each other. Clarendon, b. viii.
 Chaste.
                                         You may Convey your pleasures in a spacious plenty, And yet seem cold, the time you may so hoodwink: We've willing dames enough. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 Not welcome; not received with kindness or warmth of affection.
 My master's suit will be but cold, Since she respects my mistress' love. Sh. Two Gent. of Verona.
 Not hasty; not violent.

 Not affecting the scent strongly.
                 She made it good At the hedge corner, in the coldest fault. Shakespeare.
 Not having the scent strongly affected.
         Smell this business with a sense as cold As is a dead man's nose. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.

Cold (noun)
Cold. n.s. [from the adjective.]

 The cause of the sensation of cold; the privation of heat; the figorifick power.
 Fair lined slippers for the cold. Shakespeare.
 Heat and cold are nature's two hands, whereby she chiefly worketh: and heat we have in readiness, in respect of the fire; but for cold we must stay 'till it cometh, or seek it in deep caves, or high mountains; and when all is done, we cannot obtain it in any greet degree. Bacon's Natural History, №. 69.
 The sensation of cold; coldness; chilness.
 When she saw her lord prepar'd to part, A deadly cold ran shiv'ring to her heart. Dryden's Fables.
 A disease caused by cold; the obstruction of perspiration.
 What disease hast thou? —— A whorson cold, sir; a cough. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. 2.
 Let no ungentle cold destroy All taste we have of heav'nly joy. Roscommon.
 Those rains, so covering the earth, might providentially contribute to the disruption of it, by stopping all the pores, and all evaporation, which would make the vapours within struggle violently, as we get a fever by a cold. Burnet.

Comb (Cornish)
Comb, in Cornish, signifies a valley, and had the same meaning anciently in the French tongue.

Comb (in names)
Comb in the end, and Comp in the beginning of names, seem to be derived from the British kum, which signifies a low situation. Gibson's Camden.

Comb (noun)
Comb. n.s. [camb, Saxon; kam, Dutch.]

 An instrument to separate and adjust the hair.
By fair Ligea's golden comb,Wherewith she sits on diamond rocks,Sleeking her soft alluring locks. Milton.
I made an instrument in fashion of a comb, whose teeth, being in number sixteen, were about an inch and a half broad, and the intervals of the teeth about two inches wide. Newton.
 The top or crest of a cock, so called from its pectinated indentures.
Cocks have great combs and spurs, hens little or none. Bacon.
High was his comb, and coral-red withal,With dents embattl'd, like a castle-wall. Dryden.
 The cantons in which the bees lodge their honey. Perhaps from the same word which makes the termination of towns, and signifies hollow or deep.
                    This in affairs of state,Employ'd at home, abides within the gate,To fortify the combs, to build the wall,To prop the ruins, lest the fabrick fall. Dryd. Virg. Georg.

Comb (verb)
To Comb. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To divide, and clean, and adjust the hair with a comb.
                    Her care shall beTo comb your noddle with a three-legg'd stool. Shakespeare.
Divers with us, that are grown grey, and yet would appear young, find means to make their hair black, by combing it, as they say, with a leaden comb, or the like. Bacon's Nat. Hist.
                    She with ribbons tiedHis tender neck, and comb'd his silken hide. Dryden's Æn.
There was a sort of engine, from which were extended twenty long poles, wherewith the man-mountain combs his head. Swift.
 To lay any thing consisting of filaments smooth, by drawing through narrow interslices; as, to comb wool.

Coming (adjective)
Co'ming. participial adj. [from come.]

 Fond; forward; ready to come.
 Now will I be your Rosalind in a more coming on disposition; and ask me what you will, I will grant it. Shakespeare.
 That very lapidary himself, with a coming stomach, and in the cock's place, would have made the cock's choice. L'Estr.
 That he had been so affectionate a husband, was no ill argument to the coming dowager. Dryd. Virg. Æn. Dedic.
 On morning wings, how active springs the mind, How easy every labour it pursues, How coming to the poet every muse! Pope's Imit. of Horace.
 Future; to come.
 Praise of great acts, he scatters as a seed,Which may the like in coming ages breed. Roscommon.

Coming (noun)
Co'ming. n.s. [from To come.]

 The act of coming; approach.
 Where art thou, Adam! wont with joy to meet My coming, seen far off? Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x.
                      Sweet the coming on Of grateful ev'ning mild. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. iv.
 State of being come; arrival.
 May't please you, noble madam, to withdraw Into your private chamber; we shall give you The full cause of our coming. Shakesp. Henry VIII.
 Some people in America counted their years by the coming of certain birds amongst them at their certain seasons, and leaving them at others. Locke.

Coming-in
Coming-in. n.s. Revenue; income.
Here's a small trifle of wives, eleven widows and nine maids in a simple coming-in for one man. Shakespeare.
What are thy rents? what are thy comings-in? O ceremony, shew me but thy worth: What is thy toll, O adoration? Shakesp. Henry V.

Commerce (noun)
Cómmerce. n.s. [commercium, Latin. It was anciently accented on the last syllable.] Intercourse; exchange of one thing for another; interchange of any thing; trade; traffick.
 Places of publick resort being thus provided, our repair thither is especially for mutual conference, and, as it were, commerce to be had between God and us. Hooker, b. v. s. 17.
             How could communities, Degrees in schools, and brotherhoods in cities, Peaceful commerce from dividable shores, But by degree stand in authentick place? Sh. Troil. and Cress.
 Instructed ships shall sail to quick commerce, By which remotest regions are ally'd; Which makes one city of the universe, Where some may gain, and all may be supply'd. Dryden.
 These people had not any commerce with the other known parts of the world. Tillotson.
 In any country, that hath commerce with the rest of the world, it is almost impossible now to be without the use of silver coin. Locke.

Commerce (verb)
To Commérce. v.n. [from the noun.] To hold intercourse with.
 Come, but keep thy wonted state, With even step and musing gait, And looks commercing with the skies, Thy rapt' soul sitting in thine eyes. Milton.

Compendiarious
Compendiárious. adj. [compendiarius, Latin.] Short; contracted; summary; abridged.

Compendiosity
Compendiósity. n.s. [from compendious.] Shortness; contracted brevity. Dict.

Compendious
Compéndious. adj. [from compendium.] Short; summary; abridged; direct; comprehensive; holding much in a narrow space; near; by which time is saved, and circuition cut off.
They had learned more compendious and expeditious ways, whereby they shortened their labours, and so gained time. Woodward's Natural History.

Compendiously
Compéndiously. adv. [from compendious.] Shortly; in a short method; summarily; in epitome.
By the apostles we have the substance of Christian belief compendiously drawn into few and short articles. Hooker, b. v.
The state of condition of matter, before the world was a-making, is compendiously expressed by the word chaos. Bentley.

Compendiousness
Compéndiousness. n.s. [from compendious.] Shortness; brevity; comprehension in a narrow compass.
The inviting easiness and comprendiousness of this assertion, should dazzle the eyes. Bentley's Sermons.

Compendium
Compéndium. n.s. [Latin.] Abridgment; summary; breviate; abbreviature; that which holds much in a narrow room; the near way.
After we are grown well acquainted with a short system or compendium of a science, which is written in the plainest and most simple manner, it is then proper to read a larger regular treatise on that subject. Watt's Improvement of the Mind.

Compurgator
Compurgátor. n.s. [Latin.] One who bears his testimony to the credibility of another.
The next quarry, or chalk-pit, will give abundant attestation: these are so obvious, that I need not be far to seek for a compurgator. Woodward's Natural History.

Condemn
To Conde'mn. v.a. [condemno, Latin.]

 To find guilty; to doom to punishment; contrary to absolve.
 My conscience hath a thousand several tongues, And every tongue brings in a sev'ral tale, And ev'ry tale condemns me for a villain. Shakesp. Rich. III.
                     Is he found guilty? —— —— Yes truly, is he, and condemn'd upon 't. Sh. Hen. VIII.
Considered as a judge, it condemns where it ought to absolve, and pronounces absolution where it ought to condemn. Fiddes's Sermons.
 It has to before the punishment.
 The son of man shall be betrayed unto the scribes, and they shall condemn him to death. Mat. xx. 18.
 To censure; to blame; to declare criminal; contrary to approve.
                      Who then shall blame His pester'd senses to recoil and start, When all that is within him does condemn Itself for being there? Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 The poet who flourished in the scene, is condemned in the ruelle. Dryden's Æn. Preface.
He who was so unjust as to do his brother an injury, will scarce be so just as to condemn himself for it. Locke.
 They who approve my conduct in this particular, are much more numerous than those who condemn it. Spectator, №. 488.
 To fine.
 And the king of Egypt put him down at Jerusalem, and condemned the land in a hundred talents of silver. 2 Chro.
 To show guilt by contrast.
The righteous that is dead shall condemn the ungodly which are living. Wisd. iv. 16.

Constable
Cónstable. n.s. [comes stabuli, as it is supposed.]

 Lord high constable is an ancient officer of the crown, long disused in England, but lately subsisting in France; where the constable commanded the mareschals, and was the first officer of the army.  The function of the constable of England consisted in the care of the common peace of the land in deeds of arms, and in matters of war.  To the court of the constable and marshal belonged the cognizance of contracts, deeds of arms without the realm, and combats and blasonry of arms within it.  The first constable of England was created by the Conqueror, and the office continued hereditary 'till the thirteenth of Henry VIII. when it was laid aside, as being so powerful as to become troublesome to the king.  From these mighty magistrates are derived the inferiour constables of hundreds and franchises; two of whom were ordained, in the thirteenth of Edward I. to be chosen in every hundred for the conservation of peace, and view of armour.  These are now called high constables, because continuance of time, and increase both of people and offences, have occasioned others in every town of like nature, but inferiour authority, called petty constables.  Besides these, we have constables denominated from particular places; as constable of the Tower, of Dover castle, of the castle of Carnarvon; but these are properly castellani, or governours of castles. Cowel. Chambers.
When I came hither, I was lord high constable,And duke of Buckingham; now poor Edward Bohun. Shak.
The knave constable had set me i' th' stocks, i' th' common stocks, for a witch. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.
The constable being a sober man, and known to be an enemy to those acts of sedition, went among them, to observe what they did. Clarendon.
 To over-run the Constable. [Perhaps from conte stable, Fr. the settled, firm and stated account.] To spend more than what a man knows himself to be worth: a low phrase.

Contristate
To Contrístate. v.a. [contristo, Latin.] To sadden; to make sorrowful; to make melancholy.
 Blackness and darkness are but privatives, and therefore have little or no activity: somewhat they do contristate, but very little. Bacon's Natural History, № 73.

Conventicle
Cónventicle. n.s. [conventiculum, Latin.]

 An assembly; a meeting.
They are commanded to abstain from all conventicles of men whatsoever; even out of the church, to have nothing to do with publick business. Ayliffe's Parergon.
 An assembly for worship.  Generally used in an ill sense, including heresy or schism.
It behoveth, that the place where God shall be served by the whole church be a publick place, for the avoiding of privy conventicles, which, covered with pretence of religion, may serve unto dangerous practices. Hooker, b. v. sect. 12.
A sort of men, who are content to be stiled of the church of England, who perhaps attend its service in the morning, and go with their wives to a conventicle in the afternoon. Swift.
 A secret assembly; an assembly where conspiracies are formed.
Ay, all of you have laid your heads together,(Myself had notice of your conventicles)And all to make away my guiltless life. Shakesp. Henry VI.

Cop
Cop. n.s. [kop, Dut. cop, Sax.] The head; the top of any thing; any thing rising to a head. As a cop, vulgarly cock of hay; a cob-castle, properly cop-castle, a small castle or house on a hill. A cob of cherrystones for cop, a pile of stones one laid upon another; a tuft on the head of birds.

Corn (noun)
Corn. n.s. [corn, Sax. korn, Germ. It is found in all the Teutonick dialects; as, in an old Runick rhyme,Hagul er kaldastur corna.Hail is the coldest grain.]

 The seeds which grow in ears, not in pods; such as are made into bread.
Except a corn of wheat fall into the ground, and die, it abideth alone. John xii. 25.
The people cry you mock'd them; and, of late,When corn was given them gratis, you repin'd. Sh. Coriolan.
 Grain yet unreaped, standing in the field upon its stalk.
          Why he was met even now,Crown'd with rank fumiter and furrow-weeds,Darnel, and all the idle weeds that growIn our sustaining corn. Shakespeare's King Lear.
Landing his men, he burnt the corn all thereabouts, which was now almost ripe. Knolles's History of the Turks.
            Still a murmur runsAlong the soft inclining fields of corn. Thomson's Autumn.
 Grain in the ear, yet unthreshed.
Thou shalt come to thy grave in a full age, like as a shock of corn cometh in his season. Job, v. 26.
 An excrescence on the feet, hard and painful; probably so called from its form, though by some supposed to be denominated from its corncous or horny substance.
            Ladies, that have your feetUnplagu'd with corns, we'll have a bout with you. Shakesp.
The man that makes his toe,What he his heart should make,Shall of a corn cry woe,And turn his sleep to wake. Shakespeare's King Lear.
Even in men, aches and hurts and corns do engrieve either towards rain or towards snow. Bacon's Natural History.
The hardest part of the corn is usually in the middle, thrusting itself in a nail; whence it has the Latin appellation of clavis. Wiseman's Surgery.
He first that useful secret did explain,That pricking corns foretold the gath'ring rain. Gay's Past.
It looks as there were regular accumulations and gatherings of humours, growing perhaps in some people as corns. Arbuth.
Thus Lamb, renown'd for cutting corns,An offer'd fee from Radcliff scorns. Swift.

Corporate
Co'rporate. adj. [from corpus, Latin.] United in a body or community; enabled to act in legal processes as an individual.
Breaking forth like a sudden tempest, he over-run all Munster and Connaught, defacing and utterly subverting all corporate towns that were not strongly walled. Spenser on Ireland.
They answer in a joint and corporate voice, That now they are at fall. Shakespeare's Timon.
The nobles of Athens being not at this time a corporate assembly, therefore the resentment of the commons was usually turned against particular persons. Swift.

Corporateness
Co'rporateness. n.s. [from corporate.] The state of a body corporate; a community. Dict.

Corporation
Corpora'tion. n.s. [from corpus, Latin.]
A corporation is a body politick, authorized by the king's charter to have a common seal, one head officer or more, and members, able, by their common consent, to grant or receive, in law, any thing within the compass of their charter: even as one man may do by law all things, that by law he is not forbidden; and bindeth the successors, as a single man binds his executor or heir. Cowel.
Of angels we are not to consider only what they are, and do, in regard of their own being; but that also which concerneth them, as they are linked into a kind of corporation amongst themselves, and of society or fellowship with men. Hooker, b. i. sect. 4.
Of this we find some foot-steps in our law, Which doth her root from God and nature take; Ten thousand men she doth together draw, And of them all one corporation make. Davies.

Corporature
Co'rporature. n.s. [from corpus, Latin.] The state of being embodied. Dict.

Corporeal
Corpo'real. adj. [corporeus, Latin.]

 Having a body; not immaterial. See Corporal.
 The swiftness of those circles attribute, Though numberless, to his omnipotence, That to corporeal substances could add Speed almost spiritual. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. viii.
 Having surveyed the image of God in the soul, we are not to omit those characters that God imprinted upon the body, as much as a spiritual substance could be pictured upon a corporeal. South's Sermons.
 God being supposed to be a pure spirit, cannot be the object of any corporeal sense. Tillotson.
 The course is finish'd which thy fates decreed, And thou from thy corporeal prison freed. Dryden's Fables.
 Fix thy corporeal and internal eye On the young gnat, or new-engendr'd fly. Prior.
 It is used by Swift inaccurately for corporal.
 I am not in a condition to make a true step even on Aimsbury Downs; and I declare, that a corporeal false step is worse than a political one. Swift.

Corporeity
Corpore'ity. n.s. [from corporeus, Latin.] Materiality; the quality of being embodied; the state of having a body; bodiliness.
Since philosophy affirmeth, that we are middle substances between the soul and the body, they must admit of some corporeity which supposeth weight or gravity. Brown's Vulg. Err.
It is the saying of divine Plato, that man is nature's horizon, dividing betwixt the upper hemisphere of immaterial intellects and this lower of corporeity. Glanville's Sceps. c. iv.
The one attributed corporeity to God, and the other shape and figure. Stillingfleet.

Corporification


Corporify


Corps


Corpse


Corpulence


Corpulency


Corpulent


Corpuscle
Co'rpuscle. n.s. [corpusculum, Lat.] A small body; a particle of matter; an atom; a little fragment.
It will add much to our satisfaction, if those corpuscles can be discovered with microscopes. Newton's Opt.
Who knows what are the figures of the little corpuscles that compose and distinguish different bodies? Watts's Logick.

Corpuscular
Corpu'scular.Corpuscula'rian.

 adj. [from corpusculum, Lat.] Relating to bodies; comprising bodies. It is the distinguishing epithet of that philosophy which attempts the rational solution of all physical appearances by the action of one body upon another.


As to natural philosophy I do not expect to see any principles proposed, more comprehensive and intelligible than the corpuscularian or mechanical. Boyle.
This may be said, that the modern corpuscularians talk, in most things, more intelligibly than the peripateticks. Bently.
The mechanical or corpuscular philosophy, though peradventure the eldest, as well as the best in the world, had lain dead for many ages in contempt and oblivion. Bentley's Serm.

Corpuscularian
Corpu'scular.Corpuscula'rian.

 adj. [from corpusculum, Lat.] Relating to bodies; comprising bodies. It is the distinguishing epithet of that philosophy which attempts the rational solution of all physical appearances by the action of one body upon another.


As to natural philosophy I do not expect to see any principles proposed, more comprehensive and intelligible than the corpuscularian or mechanical. Boyle.
This may be said, that the modern corpuscularians talk, in most things, more intelligibly than the peripateticks. Bently.
The mechanical or corpuscular philosophy, though peradventure the eldest, as well as the best in the world, had lain dead for many ages in contempt and oblivion. Bentley's Serm.

Corracle
Co'rracle. See Corricle.

Corrade
To Corra'de. v.a. [corrado, Latin.] To rub off; to wear away by frequent rubbing; to scrape together.

Corradiation
Corradia'tion. n.s. [con and radius, Lat.] A conjunction of rays in one point.
The impression of colour worketh not but by a cone of direct beams, or right lines, whereof the basis is in the object, and the vertical point in the eye; so as there is a corradiation, and conjunction of beams. Bacon's Natural History, №. 277.

Correct (adjective)
Corre'ct. adj. [correctus, Latin.] Revised or finished with exactness; free from faults.
What verse can do, he has perform'd in this, Which he presumes the most correct of his. Dryd. Aur. Prol.
Always use the most correct editions: various readings will be only troublesome where the sense and language is complete. Felton on the Classicks.

Correct (verb)
To Corre'ct. v.a. [corrigo correctum, Latin.]

 To punish; to chastise; to discipline.
 Sad accidents, and a state of affliction, is a school of virtue; it corrects levity, and interrupts the confidence of sinning. Tayl.
 After he has once been corrected for a lie, you must be sure never after to pardon it in him. Locke on Education.
 Children being to be restrained by the parents only in vicious things, a look or nod only ought to correct them, when they do amiss. Locke on Education.
 To amend; to take away faults, in writings or life.
 This is a defect in the first make of some men's minds, which can scarce ever be corrected afterwards, either by learning or age. Burnet's Theory of the Earth, Preface.
 Correcting nature, from what actually she is in individuals, to what she ought to be, and what she was created. Dryden.
 I writ, because it amused me; I corrected, because it was as pleasant to me to correct as to write. Pope's Preface.
 The mind may cool, and be at leisure to attend to its domestick concern; to consider what habit wants to be corrected, and what inclination to be subdued. Rogers's Sermons.
 To obviate the qualities of one ingredient by another, or by any method of preparation.
 As in habitual gout or stone,The only thing that can be done,Is to correct your drink and diet,And keep the inward foe in quiet. Prior.
 In cases of acidity, water is the proper drink: its quality of relaxing may be corrected by boiling it with some animal substances; as ivory or hartshorn. Arbuthnot on Aliments.
 To remark fault.

Correlate (noun)
Córrelate. n.s. One that stands in the opposite relation.
It is one thing for a father to cease to be a father, by casting off his son; and another for him to cease to be so, by the death of his son: in this the relation is at an end, for want of a correlate. South's Sermons.

Correlate (verb)
To Córrelate. v.n. [from con and relatus, Latin.] To have a reciprocal relation, as father and son.

Correlative
Corrélative. adj. [con and relativus, Latin.] Having a reciprocal relation, so that the existence of one in a particular state depends upon the existence of another.
Father and son, husband and wife, and such other correlative terms, seem nearly to belong one to another. South.
Giving is a relative action, and so requires a correlative to answer it: giving, on one part, transfers no property, unless there be an accepting on the other. South's Sermons.

Correlativeness
Corrélativeness. n.s. [from correlative.] The state of being correlative.

Correption
Corréption. n.s. [corripio correptum, Latin.] Objurgation; chiding; reprehension; reproof.
If we must needs be talking of other people's faults, let it not be to defame, but to amend them, by converting our detraction and backbiting into admonition and fraternal correption. Government of the Tongue, sect. 6.

Correspond
To Correspónd. v.n. [con and respondeo, Latin.]

 To suit; to answer; to be proportionate; to be adequate to; to be adapted; to fit.
The days, if one be compared with another successively throughout the year, are found not to be equal, and will not justly correspond with any artificial or mechanical equal measures of time. Holder on Time.
Words being but empty sounds, any farther than they are signs of our ideas, we cannot but assent to them, as they correspond to those ideas we have, but no farther than that. Locke.
 To keep up commerce with another by alternate letters.

Correspondent (adjective)
Correspóndent. adj. [from correspond.] Suitable; adapted; agreeable; answerable.
 What good or evil is there under the sun, what action correspondent or repugnant unto the law which God hath imposed upon his creatures, but in or upon it God doth work, according to the law which himself hath eternally purposed to keep. Hooker.
 And as five zones th' etherial regions bind, Five correspondent are to earth assign'd. Dryden.

Corrody
Córrody. n.s. [from corrodo, Latin.] A defalcation from an allowance or salary for some other than the original purpose.
 In those days even noble persons, and other meaner men, ordered corrodies and pensions to their chaplains and servants out of churches. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Corrosion
Corrósion. n.s. [corrodo, Latin.] The power of eating or wearing away by degrees.
Corrosion is a particular species of dissolution of bodies, either by an acid, or a saline menstruum.  It is almost wholly designed for the resolution of bodies most strongly compacted, as bones and metals; so that the menstruums here employed, have a considerable moment or force.  These liquors, whether acid or urinous, are nothing but salts dissolved in a little phlegm; therefore these being solid, and consequently containing a considerable quantity of matter, do both attract one another more, and are also more attracted by the particles of the body to be dissolved; so when the more solid bodies are put into saline menstruums, the attraction is stronger than in other solutions; and the motion, which is always proportional to the attraction, is more violent: so that we may easily conceive, when the motion is in such a manner increased, it should drive the salts into the pores of the bodies, and open and loosen their cohesion, though ever so firm. Quincy.
If there be any medicine that purgeth, and hath neither of the first two manifest qualities, it is to be held suspected as a kind of poison; for that it worketh either by corrosion, or by a secret malignity and enmity to nature. Bacon's Nat. History.
That corrosion and dissolution of bodies, even the most solid and durable, which is vulgarly ascribed to the air, is caused merely by the action of water upon them; the air being so far from injuring and preying upon the bodies it environs, that it contributes to their security and preservation. Woodw.

Corrugant
Córrugant. adj. [from corrugate.] Having the power of contracting into wrinkles.

Corrugate
To Córrugate. v.a. [corrugo, Latin.] To wrinkle or purse up; as the skin is drawn into wrinkles by cold, or any other cause. Quincy.
The cramp cometh of contraction of sinews: it cometh either by cold or dryness; for cold and dryness do both of them contract and corrugate. Bacon's Natural History, № 964.

Corrugation
Corrugátion. n.s. [from corrugate.] Contraction into wrinkles.
The pain of the solid parts is the corrugation or violent agitation of fibres, when the spirits are irritated by sharp humours. Floyer on the Humours.

Corrupt (adjective)
Corrúpt. adj. [from corrupt.] Vitious; tainted with wickedness; without integrity.
 Let no corrupt communication proceed out of your mouth, but that which is good to the use of edifying. Eph. iv. 29.
 Corrupt, corrupt, and tainted in desire. Sh. M. W. of Winds.
 These kind of knaves I know, which in this plainness Harbour more craft, and more corrupter ends, Than twenty silky ducking observants. Shakes. King Lear.
 Some, who have been corrupt in their morals, have yet been infinitely solicitous to have their children piously brought up. South's Sermons.

Corrupt (verb active)
To Corrúpt. v.a. [corrumpo corruptus, Latin.]

 To turn from a sound to a putrescent state; to infect.

 To deprave; to destroy integrity; to vitiate; to bribe.
 I fear lest by any means, as the serpent beguiled Eve through his subtilty, so your minds should be corrupted from the simplicity that is in Christ. 2 Cor. xi. 3.
 Even what things they naturally know, in those very things, as hearts void of reason, they corrupted themselves. Jude, v. 10.
 Evil communications corrupt good manners. 1 Cor. xv. 33.
                     All that have miscarried By underhand, corrupted, foul injustice. Shak. Richard III.
 I have heard it said, the fittest time to corrupt a man's wife, is when she's fallen out with her husband. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
 But stay, I smell a man of middle earth; With tryal fire touch me his finger-end; If he be chaste, the flame will back descend, And turn him to no pain; but if he start, It is the flesh of a corrupted heart. Shak. M. W. of Windsor.
 Language being the conduit whereby men convey their knowledge, he that makes an ill use of it, though he does not corrupt the fountains of knowledge, which are in things, yet he stops the pipes. Locke.
 Hear the black trumpet through the world proclaim, That not to be corrupted is the shame. Pope.
 To spoil; to do mischief.

Corrupt (verb neuter)
To Corrúpt. v.n. To become putrid; to grow rotten; to putrefy.
 The aptness or propension of air or water to corrupt or putrefy, no doubt, is to be found before it break forth into manifest effects of diseases, blasting, or the like. Bacon.

Corrupton
Corrúption. n.s. [corruptio, Lat.]

 The principle by which bodies tend to the separation of their parts.

 Wickedness; perversion of principles; loss of integrity.
 Precepts of morality, besides the natural corruption of our tempers, which makes us averse to them, are so abstracted from ideas of sense, that they seldom get an opportunity for descriptions and images. Addison's Essay on the Georgicks.
 Amidst corruption, luxury and rage, Still leave some ancient virtue's to our age. Pope.
 Putrescence.
 The wise contriver, on his end intent, Careful this fatal errour to prevent, And keep the waters from corruption free, Mix'd them with salt, and season'd all the sea. Blackmore.
 Matter or pus in a sore.

 The means by which any thing is vitiated; depravation.
 After my death I wish no other herald, No other speaker of my living actions, To keep mine honour from corruption, But such an honest chronicler as Griffith. Shak. Hen. VIII.
 The region hath by conquest, and corruption of other languages, received new and differing names. Raleigh's History.
 All those four kinds of corruption are very common in their language; for which reasons the Greek tongue is become much altered. Brerewood on Language.
 [In law.] An infection growing to a man attainted of felony or treason, and to his issue: for as he loseth all to the prince, or other lord of the fee, so his issue cannot be heir to him, or to any other ancestor, of whom they might have claimed by him; and if he were noble, or a gentleman, he and his children are made ignoble and ungentle, in respect of the father. Cowel.

Corsair
Córsair. n.s. [French.] A pirate; one who professes to seize merchants.

Corselet
Córselet. n.s. [corselet, French.] A light armour for the forepart of the body.
Some shirts of maile, some coats of plate put on,Some don'd a cuirace, some a corslet bright. Fairfax, b. i.
They lash, they foin, they pass, they strive to boreTheir corslets, and their thinnest parts explore. Dryd. Fab.
But heroes, who o'ercome or die,Have their hearts hung extremely high;The strings of which, in battle's heat,Against their very cors'lets beat. Prior.

Cortical
Córtical. adj. [cortex, bark, Lat.] Barky; belonging to the outer part; belonging to the rind; outward.
Their last extremities form a little gland, (all these little glands together make the cortical part of the brain) terminating in two little vessels. Cheyne's Phil. Princ.

Corticated
Córticated. adj. [from corticatus, Lat.] Resembling the bark of a tree.
This animal is a kind of lizard, a quadruped corticated and depilous; that is, without wool, fur, or hair. Brown.

Corticose
Córticose. adj. [from corticosus, Lat.] Full of bark. Dict.

Coruscant
Corúscant. adj. [corusco, Latin.] Glittering by flashes; flashing.

Coruscation
Coruscátion. n.s. [coruscatio, Latin.] Flash; quick vibration of light.
We see that lightnings and coruscations, which are near at hand, yield no sound. Bacon's Natural History, № 114.
We may learn that sulphureous streams abound in the bowels of the earth, and ferment with minerals, and sometimes take fire with a sudden coruscation and explosion. Newton's Opt.
How heat and moisture mingle in a mass,Or belch in thunder, or in lightning blaze;Why nimble coruscations strike the eye,And bold tornado's bluster in the sky. Garth's Dispensatory.

Corvetto
Corvétto. n.s. The curvet. See Curvet.
You must draw the horse in his career with his manage, and turn, doing the corvetto and leaping. Peacham on Drawing.

Corymbiated
Corýmbiated. adj. [corymbus, Latin.] Garnished with branches of berries. Dict.

Corymbiferous
Corymbíferous. adv. [from corymbus and fero, Lat.] Bearing fruit or berries in bunches.
Corymbiferous plants are distinguished into such as have a radiate flower, as the sun-flower; and such as have a naked flower, as the hemp-agrimony, and mugwort; to which ware added those a-kin hereunto, such as scabious, teasel, thistle, and the like. Quincy.

Corymbus
Corýmbus. n.s. [Latin.]
It in general signifies the top of any thing; but amongst the ancient botanists it was used to express the bunches or clusters of berries of ivy, or the like: amongst modern botanists it is used for a compounded discous flower, whose seeds are not pappous, or do not fly away in down; such are the flowers of daisies, and common marygold; and therefore Mr. Ray makes one genus of plants to be such as have a compound discous flower, without any downy wings to carry off their seeds. Quincy.

Coscinomancy
Coscínomancy. n.s. [from κόσκινον, a sieve, and μαντέια, divination.] The art of divination by means of a sieve.  A very ancient practice mentioned by Theocritus, and still used in some parts of England, to find out persons unknown. Chambers.

Cosmical
Co'smical. adj. [κόσμος.]

 Relating to the world.

 Rising or setting with the sun; not acronychal.
The cosmical ascension of a star we term that, when it ariseth together with the sun, or in the same degree of the ecliptick wherein the sun abideth. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 13.

Costal
Cóstal. adj. [costa, Lat. a rib.] Belonging to the ribs.
Hereby are excluded all cetaceous and cartilaginous fishes, many pectinal, whose ribs are rectilineal; and many costal, which have their ribs embowed. Brown's Vulgar Err.

Cotquean
Cótquean. n.s. [probably from coquin, French.] A man who busies himself with women's affairs.
Look to the bak'd meats, good Angelica;Spare not for cost. —— Go, go, you cotquean, go;Get you to bed. Shakespeare's Romeo and Juliet.
A stateswoman is as ridiculous a creature as a cotquean: each of the sexes should keep within its particular bounds. Addison's Freeholder, № 38.
You have given us a lively picture of husbands hen-peck'd; but you have never touched upon one of the quite different character, and who goes by the name of cotquean. Add. Spect.

Couchee
Cóuchee. n.s. [French.] Bedtime; the time of visiting late at night.
None of her sylvan subjects made their court;Levees and couchees pass'd without resort. Dryden.

Courage
Cóurage. n.s. [courage, Fr. from cor, Latin.] Bravery; active fortitude; spirit of enterprise.
                The king becoming graces,Devotion, patience, courage, fortitude;I have no relish of them. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
                  Their disciplineNow mingled with their courage. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
Hope arms their courage: from their tow'rs they throwTheir darts with double force, and drive the foe. Dryden.
Courage, that grows from constitution, very often forsakes a man when he has occasion for it; and when it is only a kind of instinct in the soul, it breaks out on all occasions, without judgment or discretion. That courage which arises from the sense of our duty, and from the fear of offending Him that made us, acts always in an uniform manner, and according to the dictates of right reason. Addison's Guardian.
Nothing but the want of common courage was the cause of their misfortunes. Swift.

Court (noun)
Court. n.s. [cour, Fr. koert, Dut. curtis, low Latin.]

 The place where the prince resides; the palace.
Here do you keep a hundred knights and squires,Men so disorderly, so debauch'd and bold,That this our court, infected with their manners,Shews like a riotous inn; Epicurism and lust,Make it more like a tavern, or a brothel,Than a grac'd palace. Shakespeare's King Lear.
It shall be an habitation of dragons, and a court for owls. Isaiah, xxvi. 13.
His care and exactness, that every man should have his due, was such, that you would think he had never seen a court: the politeness and civility with which this justice was administred, would convince you he never had lived out of one. Prior's Dedication.
A suppliant to your royal court I come. Pope's Odyssey.
 The hall or chamber where justice is administered.
Are you acquainted with the differenceThat holds this present question in the court? Shakespeare.
St. Paul being brought unto the highest court in Athens to give an account of the doctrine he had preached, concerning Jesus and the resurrection, took occasion to imprint on those magistrates a future state. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Open space before a house.
You must have, before you come to the front, three courts; a green court plain, with a wall about it; a second court of the same, but more garnished, with little turrets, or other embellishments upon the wall; and a third court, to square with the front, not to be built but inclosed with a naked wall. Bacon, Essay 46.
Suppose it were the king's bedchamber, yet the meanest man in the tragedy must come and dispatch his business, rather than in the lobby or court yard (which is fitter for him), for fear the stage should be cleared, and the scenes broken. Dryd.
 A small opening inclosed with houses and paved with broad stones.

 Persons who compose the retinue of a prince.
Their wisdom was so highly esteemed, that some of them were always employed to follow the courts of their kings, to advise them. Temple.
 Persons who are assembled for the administration of justice.

 Any jurisdiction, military, civil, or ecclesiastical.
If any noise or soldier you perceiveNear to the wall, by some apparent signLet us have knowledge at the court of guard. Shak. H. VI.
                                The archbishopOf Canterbury, accompanied with otherLearned and revered fathers of his order,Held a late court at Dunstable. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
I have at last met with the proceedings of the court baron, held in that behalf. Spectator, № 623.
 The art of pleasing; the art of insinuation.
Hast thou been never base? Did love ne'er bendThy frailer virtue, to betray thy friend?Flatter me, make thy court, and say it did;Kings in a crowd would have their vices hid. Dryd. Aureng.
Some sort of people, placing a great part of their happiness in strong drink, are always forward to make court to my young master, by offering that which they love best themselves. Locke, sect. 18.
I have been considering why poets have such ill success in making their court, since they are allowed to be the greatest and best of all flatterers: the defect is, that they flatter only in print or in writing. Swift to Gay.
 It is often used in composition in most of its senses.

Court (verb)
To Court. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To woo; to solicit a woman to marriage.
Follow a shadow, it flies you;Seem to fly it, it will pursue:So court a mistress, she denies you;Let her alone, she will court you. Ben. Johnson's Forest.
Fir'd with her love, and with ambition led,The neighb'ring princes court her nuptial bed. Dryden's Æn.
Alas! Sempronius, wouldst thou talk of loveTo Marcia, whilst her father's life's in danger?Thou might'st as well court the pale trembling vestal,While she beholds the holy flame expiring. Addison's Cato.
Ev'n now, when silent scorn is all they gain,A thousand court you, though they court in vain. Pope.
 To solicit; to seek.
Their own ease and satisfaction would quickly teach children to court commendation, and avoid doing what they found condemned. Locke on Education, sect. 59.
 To flatter; to endeavour to please.

Covet (verb active)
To Cóvet. v.a. [convoiter, French.]

 To desire inordinately; to desire beyond due bounds.
             If it be a sin to covet honour, I am the most offending man alive. Shakespeare's Henry V.
                             I am yet Unknown to woman, never was forsworn, Scarcely have coveted what was mine own, at no time broke my faith. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
 O father! can it be that souls sublime, Return to visit our terrestrial clime? And that the gen'rous mind, releas'd by death, Can covet lazy limbs and mortal breath? Dryden's Æn.
 To desire earnestly.
 But covet earnestly the best gifts. 1 Cor. xii. 31.

Covet (verb neutral)
To Cóvet. v.n. To have a strong desire.
 The love of money is the root of all evil, which while some coveted after, they have erred from the faith. 1 Tim. vi.

Covetable
Cóvetable. adj. [from covet.] To be wished for; to be coveted. Dict.

Covetise
Cóvetise. n.s. [convoitise, French.] Avarice; covetousness of money.
 Most wretched wight, whom nothing might suffice, Whose greedy lust did lack in greatest store; Whose need had end, but no end covetise. Fairy Queen, b. i.

Covetous
Cóvetous. adj. [convoiteux, French.]

 Inordinately desirous.
 While cumber'd with my dropping cloaths I lay, The cruel nation, covetous of prey, Strain'd with my blood the unhospitable coast. Dryden's Æn.
 Inordinately eager of money; avaricious.
 An heart they have exercised with covetous practices. 2 Pet. ii. 14.
 What he cannot help in his nature, you must not account a vice in him: you must in no ways say he is covetous. Shakesp.
 Let never so much probability hang on one side of a covetous man's reasoning, and money on the other, it is easy to foresee which will outweigh. Locke.
 Desirous; eager: in a good sense.
                             Sheba was never More covetous of wisdom and fair virtue, Than this fair soul shall be. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 He that is envious or angry at a virtue that is not his own, at the perfection or excellency of his neighbour, is not covetous of the virtue, but of its reward and reputation, and then his intentions are polluted. Taylor's Rule of Living Holy.

Covetously
Cóvetously. adv. [from covetous.] Avariciously; eagerly.
 If he care not for't, he will supply us easily; if he covetously reserve it, how shall's get it? Shakespeare.

Covetousness
Cóvetousness. n.s. [from covetous.] Avarice; inordinate desire of money; eagerness of gain.
 When workmen strive to do better than well, They do confound their skill in covetousness. Shakes. K. John.
 He that takes pains to serve the ends of covetousness, or ministers to another's lust, or keeps a shop of impurities or intemperance, is idle in the worst sense. Taylor's Holy Living.
 Covetousness debaseth a man's spirit, and sinks it into the earth. Tillotson.

Cow (noun)
Cow n.s. [in the plural, anciently kine, or keen, now commonly cows; cu, Sax. koe, Dutch.] The female of the bull; the horned animal with cloven feet, kept for her milk and calves.
We see that the horns of oxen and cows, for the most part, are larger than the bulls; which is caused by abundance of moisture, which in the horns of the bull faileth. Bacon.
After the fever is diminished, asses and goats milk may be necessary; yea, a diet of cows milk alone. Wiseman's Surgery.
Then, leaving in the fields his grazing cows,He sought himself some hospitable house:Good Creton entertain'd his godlike guest. Dryden's Fables.

Crack (verb active)
To Crack. v.a. [kraecken, Dutch.]

 To break into chinks; to divide the parts a little from each other.
Look to your pipes, and cover them with fresh and warm litter out of the stable, a good thickness, lest the frosts crack them. Mortimer.
 To break; to split.
O, madam, my heart is crack'd, it's crack'd. Shakespeare.
Thou wilt quarrel with a man for cracking nuts, having no other reason but because thou hast hasel-eyes. Sh. Rom. and Jul.
Should some wild fig-tree take her native  bent,And heave below the gaudy monument,Would crack the marble titles, and disperseThe characters of all the lying verse. Dryd. Juv. Sat. 10.
Or as a lute, which in moist weather ringsHer knell alone, by cracking of her strings. Donne.
Honour is like that glassy bubble,That finds philosphers such trouble;Whose least part crack'd, the whole does fly,And wits are crack'd to find out why. Hudibras, p. ii. cant. 2.
 To do any thing with quickness or smartness.
Sir Balaam now, he lives like other folks;He takes his chirping pint, he cracks his jokes. Pope's Epist.
 To break or destroy any thing.
You'll crack a quart together! Ha, will you not? Shakesp.
Love cools, friendship falls off, brothers divide: in cities, mutinies; in countries, discord; in palaces, treason; and the bond cracked 'twixt son and father. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 To craze; to weaken the intellect.
I was ever of opinion, that the philosophers stone, and an holy war, were but the rendezvous of cracked brains, that wore their feather in their heads. Bacon's Holy War.
He thought none poets 'till their brains were crackt. Rosc.

Crambo
Crámbo. n.s. [a cant word, probably without etymology.] A play at which one gives a word, to which another finds a rhyme; a rhyme.
So Mævius, when he drain'd his skull To celebrate some suburb trull, His similes in order set, And ev'ry crambo he could get. Swift.

Crapulence
Crápulence. n.s. [crapula, a surfeit, Latin.] Drunkenness; sickness by intemperance.

Crapulous
Crápulous. adj. [crapulosus, Lat.] Drunken; intemperate; sick with intemperance. Dict.

Creditor
Créditor. n.s. [creditor, Latin.] He to whom a debt is owed; he that gives credit; correlative to debtor.
 There came divers of Anthonio's creditors in my company to Venice, that swear he cannot chuse but break. Shakespeare.
 I am so used to consider myself as creditor and debtor, that I often state my accounts after the same manner, with regard to heaven and my own soul. Addison's Spectator, №. 549.
 No man of honour, as that word is usually understood, did ever pretend that his honour obliged him to be chaste or temperate, to pay his creditors, to be useful to his country, to do good to mankind, to endeavour to be wise or learned, to regard his word, his promise, or his oath. Swift.

Crocitation
Crocitátion. n.s. [crocitatis, Latin.] The croaking of frogs or ravens. Dict.

Cross (adjective)
Cross. adj. [from the substantive.]

 Transverse; falling a-thwart something else.
Whatsoever penumbra should be made in the circles by the cross refraction of the second prism, all that penumbra would be conspicuous in the right lines which touch those circles. Newtons's Opticks.
The sun, in that space of time, by his annual contrary motion eastward, will be advanced near a degree of the ecliptick, cross to the motion of the equator. Holder on Time.
 The ships must needs encounter, when they either advance towards one another in direct lines, or meet in the intersection of cross ones. Bentley's Sermons.
 Oblique; lateral.
                                  Was this a face, To stand against the deep dread bolted thunder? In the most terrible and nimble stroke Of quick cross lightning? Shakespeare's King Lear.
 Adverse; opposite.
 Were both love's captives; but with fate so cross, One must be happy by the other's loss. Dryden's Aurengzebe.
 Cross to our interests, curbing sense and sin; Oppress'd without, and undermin'd within, It thrives through pain. Dryden.
 It runs cross to the belief and apprehension of the rest of mankind; a difficulty, which a modest and good man is scarce able to encounter. Atterbury's Sermons.
 Perverse; untractable.
 When, through the cross circumstances of a man's temper or condition, the enjoyment of a pleasure would certainly expose him to a greater inconvenience, then religion bids him quit it. South's Sermons.
 Peevish; fretful; ill-humoured.
 Did ever any man upon the rack afflict himself, because he had received a cross answer from his mistress? Taylor.
 All cross and distasteful humours, and whatever else may render the conversation of men grievous and uneasy to one another, must be shunned. Tillotson, Sermon 5.
 Contrary; contradictory.
 The mind brings all the ends of a long and various hypothesis together; sees how one part coheres with, and depends upon another; and so clears off all the appearing contrarieties and contradictions, that seemed to lie cross and uncouth, and to make the whole unintelligible. South's Sermons.
 Contrary to wish; unfortunate.
 We learn the great reasonableness of not only a contented, but also a thankful acquiescence in any condition, and under the crossest and severest passages of providence. South's Sermons.
 I cannot, without some regret, behold the cross and unlucky issue of my design; for by my dislike of disputes, I am engaged in one. Glanv.
 Interchanged.
Evarchus made a cross marriage also with Dorilaus's sister, and shortly left her with child of the famous Pyrocles. Sidney.
 They had long conference, not only upon commerce, but upon cross marriages, to be had between the king's son and the archduke's daughter; and again, between the archduke's son and the king's daughter. Bacon's Henry VII.

Cross (noun)
Cross. n.s. [croix, Fr.  croce, Ital.  crux, Latin.]

 One strait body laid at right angles over another; the instrument by which the Saviour of the world suffered death.
 They make a little cross of a quill, longways of that part of the quill which hath the pith, and crossways of that piece of the quill without pith. Bacon's Natural History, №. 494.
 You are first to consider seriously the infinite love of your Saviour, who offered himself for you as a sacrifice upon the cross. Taylor's Guide to the Penitent.
 The ensign of the Christian religion.
 Her holy faith and Christian cross oppos'd Against the Saxon gods. Rowe..
 A monument with a cross upon it to excite devotion; such as were anciently set in market-places.
                              She doth stray about By holy crosses, where she kneels and prays. Shakespeare.
  A line drawn through another.

 Any thing that thwarts or obstructs; misfortune; hindrance; vexation; opposition; misadventure; trial of patience.
 Wishing unto me many crosses and mischances in my love, whenever I should love. Sidney, b. i.
 Then let us teach our trial patience, Because it is a customary cross. Shakespeare.
 Heaven prepares good men with  crosses; but no ill can happen to a good man. Ben. Johnson's Discoveries.
 A great estate hath great crosses, and a mean fortune hath but small ones. Taylor's Rule of Living Holy.
 Money so called, because marked with a cross.
 He was said to make soldiers spring up out of the very earth to follow him, though he had not a cross to pay them salary. Howel's Vocal Forest.
 Whereas we cannot much lament our loss, Who neither carry'd back nor brought one cross. Dryden.
 Cross and Pile, a play with money; at which it is put to chance whether the side, which bears a cross, shall lie upward, or the other.
 Whacum had neither cross nor pile; His plunder was not worth the while. Hudibras, p. ii.
 This I humbly conceive to be perfect boys play; cross, I win, and pile, you lose; or, what's yours is mine, and what's mine is my own. Swift.

Cross (preposition)
Cross. prep.

 A-thwart; so as to intersect any thing.
 They were advertised, that the enemy had, in the woods before them, whereby they were to pass, cut down great trees cross the ways, so that their horse could not possibly pass that way. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 Betwixt the midst and these, the gods assign'd Two habitable seats of human kind; And cross their limits cut a sloaping way, Which the twelve signs in a beauteous order sway. Dryd. Virg.
 Cross his back, as in triumphant scorn, The hope and pillar of the house was born. Dryd. Fables.
 Over; from side to side.
 A fox was taking a walk one night cross a village. L'Estran.

Cross (verb active)
Cross. v.a. [from the noun.]

 To lay one body, or draw one line, a-thwart another.
 This forc'd the stubborn'st, for the cause, To  cross the cudgels to the laws; That what by breaking them't had gain'd, By their support might be maintain'd. Hudibras, p. iii c. 2.
 The loxia, or cross-bill, whose bill is thick and strong, with the tips crossing one another, with great readiness breaks open fir-cones, apples, and other fruit, to come at their kernels; as if the crossing of the bill was designed for this service. Derham's Physico-Theology.
 I shall most carefully observe, not to cross over, or deface the copy of your papers for the future, and only to mark in the margin. Pope.
 A hunted hare treads back her mazes, and crosses and confounds her former track. Watts.
 To sign with the cross.

 To mark out; to cancel; as, to cross an article.

 To pass over.
 He conquered this proud Turk as far as the Hellespont, which he crossed, and made a visit to the Greek emperor at Constaninople. Temple.
          We found the hero, for whose only sake We sought the dark abodes, and cross'd the bitter lake. Dry.
 To move laterally, obliquely, or a-thwart; not in opposition; not in the same line.
 But he them spying, 'gan to turn aside, For fear, as seem'd, or for some feined loss; More greedy they of news, fast towards him do cross. Spens.
 To thwart; to interpose obstruction; to embarrass; to obstruct; to hinder.
 Still do I cross this wretch, whatso he taketh in hand. Hooker.
              The king no longer could endure Thus to be cross'd in what he did intend. Daniel's Civ. War.
 He was so great an enemy to Digby and Colepeper, who were only present in debates of the war with the officers, that he crossed all they proposed. Clarendon, b. viii.
          &nbsp ;  Bury'd in private, and so suddenly! It crosses my design, which was t' allow The rites of funeral fitting his degree. Dryd. Span. Fryar.
 Swell'd with our late successes on the foe, Which France and Holland wanted pow'r to cross, We urge an unseen fate. Dryden.
                          The firm patriot there, Though still by faction, vice, and fortune crost, Shall find the generous labour was not lost. Addison's Cato.
 To counteract.
 Then their wills clash with their understandings, and their appetites cross their duty. Locke.
 To contravene; to hinder by authority; to countermand.
 No governour is suffered to go on with any one course, but upon the least information he is either stopped and crossed, or other courses appointed him from hence. Spenser on Ireland.
 It may make my case dangerous, to cross this in the smallest. Shakespeare's Measure for Measure.
 To contradict.
 In all this there is not a syllable which any ways crosseth us. Hooker, b. ii. sect. 6.
 It is certain, howsoever it cross the received opinion, that sounds may be created without air. Bacon's Natural History.
 To debar; to preclude.
From his loins no hopeful branch shall spring, To cross me from the golden time I look for. Shakes. H. VI.

Cross (verb neuter)
To Cross. v.n.

 To lye a-thwart another thing.

 To be inconsistent.
 Men's actions do not always cross with reason. Sidney.

Cruciate
To Crúciate. v.a. [crucio, Latin.] To torture; to torment; to excruciate.

Crucible
Crúcible. n.s. [crucibulum, low Latin.] A chymist's melting pot, made of earth; so called, because they were formerly marked with a cross.
Take a quantity of good silver, and put it in a crucible or melting cruse, and set them on the fire, well covered round about with coals. Peacham on Drawing.

Cruciferous
Crucíferous. adj. [crux and fero, Latin.] Bearing the cross. Dict.

Crucifier
Crúcifier. n.s. [from crucify.] He that inflicts the punishment of crucifixion.
Visible judgments were executed on Christ's crucifiers. Hammond on Fundamentals.

Crucifix
Crúcifix. n.s. [crucifixus, Latin.] A representation in picture or statuary of our Lord's passion.
There stands at the upper end of it a large crucifix, very much esteemed.  The figure of our Saviour represents him in his last agonies of death. Addison on Italy.

Crucifixion
Crucifíxion. n.s. [from crucifixus, Latin.] The punishment of nailing to a cross.
This earthquake, according to the opinion of many learned men, happened at our Saviour's crucifixion. Addison on Italy.

Cruciform
Crúciform. adj. [crux and forma, Latin.] Having the form of a cross.

Crucify
To Crúcify. v.a. [crucifigo, Latin.] To put to death by nailing the hands and feet to a cross set upright.
They crucify to themselves the son of God afresh, and put him to an open shame. Hebr. vi. 6.
But to the cross he nails thy enemies,The law that is against thee, and the sinsOf all mankind, with him there crucify'd. Milt. Par. Lost.

Crucigerous
Crucígerous. adj. [cruciger, Latin.] Bearing the cross.

Cruentate
Crúentate. adj. [cruentatus, Latin.] Smeared with blood.
Atomical aporrheas pass from the cruentate cloth or weapon to the wound. Glanv. Sceps. c. 24.

Cruise (noun 1)
Cruise. n.s. [kruicke, Dutch.] A small cup.
I have not a cake, but an handful of meal in a barrel, and a little oil in a cruise. 1 Kings, xvii. 12.
The train prepare a cruise of curious mold,A cruise of fragrance, form'd of burnish'd gold. Pope's Oddyss.

Cruise (noun 2)
A Cruise. n.s. [croise, Fr. from the original cruisers, who bore the cross, and plundered only infidels.]  A voyage in search of plunder.

Cruise (verb)
Cruise. v.n. [from the noun.] To rove over the sea in search of opportunities to plunder; to wander on the sea without any certain course.

Cruiser
Crúiser. n.s. [from cruise.] One that roves upon the sea in search of plunder.
Amongst the cruisers it was complained, that their surgeons were too active in amputating fractured members. Wiseman.

Cubation
Cubátion. n.s. [cubatio, Lat.] The act of lying down. Dict.

Cubatory
Cúbatory. adj. [from cubo, Lat.] Recumbent. Dict.

Cubature
Cúbature. n.s. [from cube.] The finding exactly the solid content of any proposed body. Harris.

Cube
Cube. n.s. [from κῦβος, a die.]

 [In geometry.] A regular solid body, consisting of six square and equal faces or sides, and the angles all right, and therefore equal. Chambers.

 [In arithmetick.] See Cubick Number.
 All the master planets move about the sun at several distances, as their common center, and with different velocities.  This common law being observed in all of them, that the squares of the times of the revolutions are proportional to the cubes of their distances. Grew's Cosmolog. b. i. c. 2. s. 6.

Cube Root
Cube Root.Cúbick Root.

n.s. The origin of a cubick number; or a number, by whose multiplication into itself, and again into the product, any given number is formed: thus two is the cube-root of eight. Chambers.

Cubeb
Cúbeb. n.s. A small dried fruit resembling pepper, but somewhat longer, of a greyish-brown colour on the surface, and composed of a corrugated or wrinkled external bark, covering a single and thin friable shell of capsule, containing a single seed of a roundish figure, blackish on the surface, and white within.  It has an aromatick, but not very strong smell, and is acrid and pungent to the taste, but less so than pepper. Cubebs are brought into Europe from the island of Java; but the plant, which produces them, is wholly unknown to us.  They are warm and carminative; and the Indians steep them in wine, and esteem them provocatives to venery. Hill.
 Aromaticks, as cubebs, cinnamon, and nutmegs, are usually put into crude poor wines, to give them more oily spirits. Floyer on the Humours.

Cubical
Cúbical.Cúbick.

adj. [from cube.]



 Having the form or properties of a cube.
 A close vessel, containing ten cubical feet of air, will not suffer a wax-candle of an ounce to burn in it above an hour before it be suffocated. Wilkin's Math. Mag.
 It is above a hundred to one, against any particular throw, that you do not cast any given set of faces with four cubical dice; because there are so many several combinations of the six faces of four dice. Bentley's Sermons.
 It is applied to numbers.
 The number of four, multiplied into itself, produceth the square number of sixteen; and that again multiplied by four, produceth the cubick number of sixty-four.  If we should suppose a multitude actually infinite, there must be infinite roots, and square and cubick numbers; yet, of necessity, the root is but the fourth part of the square, and the sixteenth part of the cubick number. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
 The number of ten hath been as highly extolled, as containing even, odd, long and plain, quadrate and cubical numbers. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.

Cubicalness
Cúbicalness. n.s. [from cubical.] The state or quality of being cubical.

Cubick
Cúbical.Cúbick.

adj. [from cube.]



 Having the form or properties of a cube.
 A close vessel, containing ten cubical feet of air, will not suffer a wax-candle of an ounce to burn in it above an hour before it be suffocated. Wilkin's Math. Mag.
 It is above a hundred to one, against any particular throw, that you do not cast any given set of faces with four cubical dice; because there are so many several combinations of the six faces of four dice. Bentley's Sermons.
 It is applied to numbers.
 The number of four, multiplied into itself, produceth the square number of sixteen; and that again multiplied by four, produceth the cubick number of sixty-four.  If we should suppose a multitude actually infinite, there must be infinite roots, and square and cubick numbers; yet, of necessity, the root is but the fourth part of the square, and the sixteenth part of the cubick number. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
 The number of ten hath been as highly extolled, as containing even, odd, long and plain, quadrate and cubical numbers. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. iv. c. 12.

Cubick Root
Cube Root.Cúbick Root.

n.s. The origin of a cubick number; or a number, by whose multiplication into itself, and again into the product, any given number is formed: thus two is the cube-root of eight. Chambers.

Cubiculary
Cubículary. adj. [cubiculum, Latin] Fitted for the posture of lying down.
 Custom, by degrees, changed their cubiculary beds into discubitory, and introduced a fashion to go from the baths unto these. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. v. c. 6.

Cudgel-proof
Cudgel-proof. adj. Able to resist a stick.
His doublet was of sturdy buff,And though not sword, yet cudgel-proof. Hudibras, p. i.

Curious
Cúrious. adj. [curiosus, Latin.]

 Inquisitive; desirous of information; addicted to enquiry.
Be not curious in unnecessary matters; for more things are shewn unto thee than men understand. Ecclus. iii. 23.
Even then to them the spirit of lyes suggests,That they were blind, because they saw not ill;And breath'd into their uncorrupted breastsA curious wish, which did corrupt their will. Davies.
 Attentive to; diligent about: sometimes with after.
It is a pity a gentleman so very curious after things that were elegant and beautiful, should not have been as curious as to their origin, their uses, and their natural history. Woodward.
 Sometimes with of.
Then thus a senior of the place replies,Well read, and curious of antiquities. Dryden's Fables.
 Accurate; careful not to mistake.
'Till Arrianism had made it a matter of great sharpness and subtlety of wit to be a sound believing Christian, men were not curious what syllables or particles of speech they used. Hook.
 Difficult to please; solicitous of perfection; not negligent; full of care.
A temperate person is not curious of fancies and deliciousness; he thinks not much, and speaks not often of meat and drink. Taylour.
 Exact; nice; subtle.
Both these senses embrace their objects at greater distance, with more variety, and with a more curious discrimation, than the other sense. Holder.
 Artful; not neglectful; not fortuitous.
A vaile obscur'd the sunshine of her eyes,The rose within herself her sweetness closed;Each ornament about her seemly lies,By curious chance, or careless art, composed. Fairfax, b. ii.
 Elegant; neat; laboured; finished.
Understanding to devise curious works, to work in gold. Ex.
 Rigid; severe; rigorous.
        For curious I cannot be with you,Signior Baptista, of whom I hear so well. Shakespeare.

Curse (noun)
Curse. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Malediction; wish of evil to another.
Neither have I suffered my mouth to sin, by wishing a curse to his soul. Job. xxxi. 30.
I never went from your lordship but with a longing to return, or without a hearty curse to him who invented ceremonies, and put me on the necessity of withdrawing. Dryden.
 Affliction; torment; vexation.
Curse on the stripling! how he apes his sire!Ambitiously sententious! Addison's Cato.

Curse (verb active)
To Curse. v.a. [cursian, Saxon]

 To wish evil to; to execrate; to devote.
After Solyman had looked upon the dead body, and bitterly cursed the same, he caused a great weight to be tied unto it, and so cast unto the sea. Knolles's History of the Turks.
What, yet again! the third time hast thou curst me:This imprecation was for Laius' death,And thou hast wished me like him. Dryd. and Lee's Oedipus.
 To mischief; to afflict; to torment.
On impious realms and barb'rous kings imposeThy plagues, and curse 'em with such sons as those. Pope.

Curse (verb neuter)
To Curse. v.n. To imprecate; to deny or affirm with imprecation of divine vengeance.
The silver about which thou cursedst, and speakest of also in my ears, behold the silver is with me. Jud. xvi. 2

Curvet (noun)
Cúrvet. n.s. [from the verb.]

 A leap; a bound.

 A frolick; a prank.

Curvet (verb)
To Cúrvet. v.n. [corvettare, Italian.]

 To leap; to bound.
Cry, holla! to thy tongue; I pr'ythee: it curvets unseasonably. Shakespeare's As you like it.
Himself he on an earwig set,Yet scarce he on his back could get,So oft and high he did curvet,'Ere he himself could settle. Drayton's Nymphid.
Seiz'd with unwonted pain, surpriz'd with fright,The wounded steed curvets; and, rais'd upright,Lights on his feet before: his hoofs behindSpring up in air aloft, and lash the wind. Dryden's Æneis.
 To frisk; to be licentious.

Cynanthropy
Cynánthropy. n.s. [κυων κυνος and ανθρωπος.] A species of madness in which men have the qualities of dogs.

Cynegeticks
Cynegéticks. n.s. [κυνεγητικα.] The art of hunting; the art of training and hunting with dogs.

Cynical
Cýnical.Cýnick.

 adj. [κυνικος.] Having the qualities of a dog; currish; brutal; snarling; satirical.


 He doth believe that some new fangled wit (it is his cynical phrase) will some time or other find out his art. Wilkins.

Cynick (adjective)
Cýnical.Cýnick.

 adj. [κυνικος.] Having the qualities of a dog; currish; brutal; snarling; satirical.


 He doth believe that some new fangled wit (it is his cynical phrase) will some time or other find out his art. Wilkins.

Cynick (noun)
Cýnick. n.s. [κύνικος.] A philosopher of the snarling or currish sort; a follower of Diogenes; a rude man; a snarler; a misanthrope.
 How vilely doth this cynick rhime? — Get you hence, sirrah; saucy fellow, hence. Shakespeare.

Cynosure
Cy'nosure. n.s. [from κύνοσουρα.] The star near the North-pole, by which sailors steer.
Towers and battlements it sees Bosom'd high in tufted trees Where perhaps some beauty lies, The cynosure of neighbouring eyes. Milton.

Cyon
Cy'on. See Cion.
Gather cyons for graffs before the buds sprout. Evelyn.

Cypress-tree
Cypress-tree. [cypressius, Latin.]
Its leaves are squamose and flat: the male flowers, which are likewise squamose, grow at remote distances from the fruit on the same tree. The fruit is of a spherical form, and is composed of many woody tubercles, in which are contained hard angular seeds. Miller.
The cypress is a tall strait tree, produced with great difficulty. Its fruit is of no use: its leaves are bitter, and the very smell and shade of it are dangerous. Hence the Romans looked upon it to be a fatal tree, and made use of it at funerals, and in mournful ceremonies. The wood of the cypress-tree is always green, very heavy, of a good smell, and never either rots or is worm eaten. It is distinguished into male and female: the branches of the male are, as it were, horizontal; and those of the female are upright, which is therefore generally sued for palissades of gardens, and to make pyramids. The fruit is round, of an olive colour, and as large as nuts when they are ripe, and it grows in separate places. The Latins call it conus, because of its figure. This fruit is composed of a kind of scales, in the clefts of which are hidden little seeds, flat and angular. This tree is common on mount Libanus. Calmet.
 In ivory coffers I have stufft my crowns; In cypress chests my arras counterpanes. Shakespeare.
 He taketh the cypress and the oak, which he strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest. Is. xiiv. 14.
 Poplars and alders ever quivering play'd, And nodding cypress form'd a fragrant shade. Pope's Odyss.

 Being anciently used in funerals, it is the emblem of mourning.
                          Poison be their drink, Their sweetest shade a grove of cypress trees. Shak. Hen. VI.

Cyprus
Cy'prus. n.s. [I suppose from the place where it was made; or corruptly from cypress, as being used in mourning.] A thin transparent black fluff.
Lawn as white as driven snow, Cyprus black as e'er was crow. Shaksp. Winter's Tale.
                     To one of your receiving, Enough is shewn: a cyprus, not a bosom, Hides my poor heart! Shakespeare.

Cyst
Cyst.Cýstis.

n.s. [κυστις.] A bag containing some morbid matter.


 In taking it out the cystis broke, and shewed itself by its matter to be a meliceris. Wiseman's Surgery.
 There may be a consumption, with a purulent spitting, when the vomica is contained in a cyst or bag; upon the breaking of which the patient is commonly suffocated. Arbuthnot on Diet.

Cystick
Cy'stick. adj. [from cyst, a bag.] Contained in a bag.
The bile is of two sorts; the cystick, or that contained in the gall-bladder, which a fort of repository for the gall; or the hepatick, or what flows immediately from the liver. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Cystis
Cyst.Cýstis.

n.s. [κυστις.] A bag containing some morbid matter.


 In taking it out the cystis broke, and shewed itself by its matter to be a meliceris. Wiseman's Surgery.
 There may be a consumption, with a purulent spitting, when the vomica is contained in a cyst or bag; upon the breaking of which the patient is commonly suffocated. Arbuthnot on Diet.

Cystotomy
Cystótomy. n.s. [χύστις and τέμνω.] The act or practice of opening incysted tumours, or cutting the bag in which any morbid matter is contained.

Czar
Czar. n.s. [A Sclavonian word, written more properly tzar.] The title of the emperour of Russia.

Czarina
Czarína. n.s. [from czar.] The empress of Russia.
